HUMAN  SPACEFLIGHT:  THE  SPACE  SHUTTLE  AND 

BEYOND

S.  HRG.  109–230

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND SPACE

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  18,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

25–323 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  SPACE 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Ranking 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 18, 2005 ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison ............................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott ......................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Griffin,  Dr.  Michael  D.,  Administrator,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space
Administration .....................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Horowitz,  Dr.  Scott  J.,  Director,  Space  Transportation  and  Exploration,  ATK 
Thiokol, Inc. ..........................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Johnson-Freese,  Dr.  Joan,  Chairman,  Department  of  National  Security
Studies, Naval War College .................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
McCulley, Michael J., President and CEO, United Space Alliance .....................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Li,  Allen,  Director,  Acquisition  and  Sourcing  Management,  U.S.  Government 
Accountability Office ............................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
1
2
3
2

3
5

23
24

18
19
13
14

34
36

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement ...........

45

APPENDIX 

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

HUMAN  SPACEFLIGHT:  THE  SPACE  SHUTTLE 

AND  BEYOND 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  18,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND SPACE, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:47 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Kay  Bailey 
Hutchison, Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  am  starting  because  there  is  a  possibility 
that at 11:30 we will have to break because of what we call the 2-
hour  rule  being  invoked.  And  therefore,  I  am  going  to  jump  right 
in with our first witness and want to welcome Dr. Griffin. We very 
much appreciate all that you have done in the very short time that 
you have been in place. Today’s focus is going to be the Space Shut-
tle  and  how  we  are  going  to  utilize  it  fully  and  go  forward  with  a 
crew  return  vehicle.  We  are  very  concerned  on  this  Committee,  as 
we have made clear, and I know you are as well, about the current 
status  of  our  ability  to  fly  the  Space  Shuttle  beyond  Return  to 
Flight,  how  long  can  we  use  it,  and  what  your  plans  are  to  bring 
up the crew return vehicle. 

In  addition,  in  the  question  period  I  want  to  say  that  I  want  to 
start  talking  about  not  only  the  crew  return  vehicle,  which  is,  I 
know,  in  the  top  three  priorities  for  NASA,  but  what  we  are  plan-
ning  to  do  with  cargo,  a  capacity  to  take  the  payloads  to  and  from 
space that we cannot take on the crew return vehicle. 

You  have  said  to  me  straight  out  the  Space  Shuttle  is  flawed. 
The words are indelibly impressed on my mind from the last hear-
ing. And therefore, I want to know how we are going to get equip-
ment  and  repair-type  tools  up  there,  when  we  have  a  crew  return 
vehicle, and where that stands in the priority list. 

It  is  essential  that  we  learn  from  mistakes  made  in  the  past,  as 
we develop a new generation of vehicles for human space flight. We 
do not have the luxury of time or resources or making a false start, 
as  we  add  the  new  dimension  of  Moon,  Mars,  and  beyond.  So  I 
hope that we can go one step beyond where you did in your hearing 
for confirmation about where you see the main priorities for NASA, 
which  are  Return  to  Flight,  the  Crew  Return  Vehicle,  and  the  fin-
ishing of the Space Station. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

And,  of  course,  as  you  know,  Dr.  Griffin,  my  fourth  priority,  but 
very high on the list and considered essential to me, is the science 
research  at  the  Space  Station  going  on  a  continuing  basis  rather 
than being delayed for the first three priorities. 

So  with  that,  I  will  welcome  my  Ranking  Member,  Senator  Nel-
son,  who  is  our  only  senator  who  has  been  in  space.  And  let  me 
say I am glad you are here. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Hutchison follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 
I  am  pleased  to  welcome  our  witnesses  here  today  for  this  hearing  on  Human 
Space Flight—The Space Shuttle and Beyond. I know you are all very busy people, 
and  the  Subcommittee  appreciates  your  willingness  to  be  here  with  us  to  discuss 
some very important issues for the future of human space flight. 

I  am  especially  pleased  to  welcome  Dr.  Michael  Griffin  here,  who  is  perhaps 
busier  than  all  of  us,  as  he  continues  to  assume  the  helm  of  NASA,  assemble  his 
leadership  team,  and  prepare  to  give  the  go-ahead  for  the  Space  Shuttle’s  return 
to flight. 

We  begin  the  focus  of  today’s  hearing  on  the  Space  Shuttle,  because  that  is  this 
nation’s  only  human  space  flight  vehicle.  The  Space  Shuttle  continues  to  represent 
an  incredibly  valuable  national  asset.  We  all  share,  I’m  sure,  the  great  hope  that 
it will return to flight in July as a safer, more capable vehicle than ever before. 

This hearing is not intended to delve into the near-term issues or the steps taken 
to  prepare  for  Return  to  Flight.  Rather,  we  hope  to  review  the  role  of  the  Space 
Shuttle  as  representing  an  essential  U.S.  capability  to  fly  humans  and  cargo  into 
space  and  back  to  the  Earth.  We  will  hear  about  the  current  status  of  our  ability 
to continue flying the Space Shuttle, and plans for its use after a successful Return 
to  Flight.  We  expect  to  hear  about  the  need  to  ensure  that  the  United  States  has 
such a capability and can sustain human space flight into the future without a seri-
ous  gap  in  our  ability  to  do  so.  We  hope  to  hear  what  steps  are  now  being  taken 
and  will  be  taken  in  the  future  to  develop  a  successor  to  the  Space  Shuttle  in  a 
manner  that  provides  a  smooth,  uninterrupted  transition  from  one  U.S.  human 
space flight capability to the next. 

With  talk—and  plans—to  retire  the  Space  Shuttle,  we  must  carefully  guard 
against  the  premature  loss  of  either  skilled  expertise  in  the  workforce  or  industrial 
capacity  to  support  and  sustain  the  Space  Shuttle  for  however  much  longer  it  will 
fly. Members of our second panel will address these and other issues. 

It  is  essential  that  we  learn  from  the  mistakes  made  in  past  efforts  to  develop 
a new generation of vehicles for U.S. human spaceflight. We do not have the luxury 
of either time or resources to make another false start as we add the new dimension 
of the Moon, Mars and beyond to this nation’s human spaceflight capability. 

This hearing is intended to set the stage for what will be the Subcommittee’s on-
going efforts to monitor and ensure the success of U.S. efforts to sustain an effective, 
uninterrupted national human spaceflight capability. 

I  look  forward  to  our  witnesses’  testimony  and  their  response  to  questions  of  the 

Subcommittee.

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chairman.  And  I  under-
stand that it is possible that we are going to have to conclude this 
by 11:30. Is that correct? 

Senator HUTCHISON. That is correct. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Then I will just say, Dr. Griffin, in the in-
terest of time, I think you have demonstrated extraordinary leader-
ship.  And  you  have  only  been  on  the  job  a  month.  But,  of  course, 
we  knew  that.  That  is  why  Senator  Hutchison  and  I  both  encour-
aged  your  appointment  and  then  your  confirmation,  once  ap-
pointed.  So  we  are  very  grateful.  And  I  think  that  what  you  have 
done  in  trying  to  lessen  the  hiatus  between  the  CEV  and  the  end 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

of the Space Shuttle is not only commendable, it is absolutely nec-
essary, as well as you taking a fresh look at whether or not we can 
go and service Hubble. I thank you for that. 

And I will reserve my comments for questions. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Senator Lott? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT,
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  LOTT.  Thank  you,  Senator  Hutchison.  And  I  am  so 
pleased  that  you  have  taken  over  this  Subcommittee  Chairman-
ship.  Your  interest,  your  knowledge,  and  your  energy  will  be  very 
helpful. 

And  I  want  to  also  recognize  Dr.  Griffin’s  good  work  already.  I 
just  sense  a  change  already,  which  is  pretty  impressive.  And  I  am 
wishing you the best. And we want to be partners with you in try-
ing  to  get  this  very  important  agency  up  and  running  and  doing 
the kind of job we know it can do. 

I know there will be lots of discussion about your plans to accel-
erate  the  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle  acquisition  and  how  NASA’s 
other programs will be affected by the increased emphasis on space 
exploration.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  achieve  the 
former while making the latter more plausible. 

I  also  want  to  thank  you  for  going  forward  with  the  NASA 
Shared  Services  Center  decision.  I  think  you  made  a  good  choice. 
Obviously  I  am  prejudiced  in  that  regard,  but  there  were  a  lot  of 
things  to  consider,  a  lot  of  countervailing  pressures.  And  I  think 
you  made  the  right  decision  and  that  the  history  of  this  will  show 
that it will serve NASA well. 

I  also  understand  that  the  U.S.  Trade  Representative  is  pro-
viding  you  with  guidance  on  the  use  of  NASA  facilities  in  connec-
tion  with  a  EADS-proposed  U.S.  commercial  aviation  research  and 
manufacturing facility. And I would urge you to work as closely as 
you  can  with  the  State  of  Mississippi  and  Hancock  County  in  our 
state with respect to this proposal. 

And so basically, I just wanted to get those things on record. And 
at  this  point  it  makes  me  feel  good  to  be  able  to  come  to  a  NASA 
hearing  and  commend  a  NASA  representative  for  their  effort. 
Maybe  it  is  just  because  you  are  just  getting  started,  but  I  hope 
you can keep it up. Good luck, sir. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you, Senator Lott. I am very pleased 
that  you  are  staying  active  on  the  Subcommittee,  because  I  do 
want  to  have  a  reauthorization  of  NASA  this  year.  And  I  do  plan 
to invigorate our oversight efforts. 

Dr. Griffin, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF DR. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Hutchison,  Senator  Lott,  Sen-

ator Nelson. I appreciate your very kind remarks. 

I will endeavor to continue in the pattern that we have begun in 
our relationship, which is to give you the best answers that I have 
to the questions that you ask. And if the answers are difficult, then 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

marks. 

I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  make  them  as  palatable  as 
we can. But I will tell you every time what I believe to be the case. 
Senator Hutchison, while you were mentioning that the most im-
portant  person  for  the  hearing  was  here  so  we  could  start,  I  was 
actually thinking in my own mind that my role was more like that 
of  the  pig  in  a  ham  and  eggs  breakfast.  You  cannot  start  without 
me, but I am at the wrong end of the food chain. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  So  with  that,  I  will  continue  with  my  formal  re-

Madam  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for 
the opportunity to appear before you today to discuss the plans for 
the  Space  Shuttle  in  carrying  out  the  first  steps  of  the  Vision  for 
Space Exploration with Return to Flight and assembly of the Inter-
national Space Station, our plans to date for the Shuttle retirement 
by  2010,  and  our  progress  in  minimizing  the  gap  between  retire-
ment of the Orbiter and the first flight of the Crew Exploration Ve-
hicle. 

In presenting the vision last year, the President——
Senator HUTCHISON. Dr. Griffin, could I interrupt you? 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  You  were  not  planning  to  read  your  whole 

statement, were you? Could you summarize? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I had an oral statement. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Is it different from your written statement? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  It  is.  But  let  me  shortcut  it  in  the  interest  of  time. 
Let  me  just  go  forward  and  say  we  are  in  the  middle  of  returning 
to flight. As you know, we delayed by 3 months. We think that was 
the  right  thing  to  do.  The  recommendation  was  presented  to  me, 
and I concurred with it. We are still working some technical issues. 
We will go when we can. 

We are, as I believe you now know, working vigorously at NASA 
to  consider  alternate  options  for  space  station  assembly  sequence, 
looking at how we can complete the station consistent with our ob-
ligations and yet consistent with a Shuttle retirement date in 2010. 
I  have  promised  the  Congress  the  results  of  this  internal  study  by 
mid-summer. 

We are looking at phasing out Shuttle operations. We have stud-
ied  lessons  from  the  Titan  IV  community.  We  are  considering  how 
the phase-out of the Shuttle orbiter will be consistent with the de-
velopment  of  a  new  architecture  for  the  CEV,  its  transportation 
system and human return to the Moon. There are a number of crit-
ical  decisions  that  need  to  be  made  in  that  regard.  And  we  will  be 
sharing those with you as we go forward. 

As  I  have  just  said,  we  have  an  Exploration  Systems  Architec-
ture  Study  (ESAS)  ongoing  at  headquarters  in  parallel  with  our 
Space Station assembly study. Preliminary results from that study 
also  will  be  made  available  to  the  Congress  by  mid-summer.  And 
I look forward to working with you as we shape that up. 

And  with  that,  as  I  have  testified  previously  in  my  confirmation 
hearing  and  last  week,  I  believe  with  you  that  the  gap  in  human 
space  flight  capability,  access  to  space  by  the  United  States  be-
tween  the  necessary  retirement  of  the  Shuttle  Orbiter  and  the 
bringing  on  line  the  new  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle  must  be  abso-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

lutely  minimized.  And  I  look  forward  to  working  with  your  Com-
mittee and with the Congress as a whole to achieve that goal. 

Thank you. And I stand ready for your questions. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Well, thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Griffin follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN, ADMINISTRATOR, NATIONAL 

AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 

Madam  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee;  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  status  and  role  of  the  Space  Shuttle  in 
human  space  flight,  our  plans  for  the  Shuttle’s  retirement,  our  progress  in  mini-
mizing  the  gap  between  the  retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle  and  the  introduction 
of the Crew Exploration Vehicle. 

On  January  14,  2004,  President  George  W.  Bush  announced  the  Vision  for  Space 
Exploration. The President’s directive gave NASA a new and historic focus and clear 
objectives. The fundamental goal of this directive for the Nation’s space exploration 
program is ‘‘. . . to advance U.S. scientific, security, and economic interests through 
a  robust  space  exploration  program.’’  In  issuing  this  directive,  the  President  com-
mitted the Nation to a journey of exploring the solar system and beyond, returning 
humans to the Moon, and sending robots and ultimately humans to Mars and other 
destinations.  NASA  embraced  this  direction  and  began  a  long-term  transformation 
to enable us to achieve this goal. 

The  first  steps  in  enabling  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  are  to  return  the 
Space  Shuttle  fleet  to  flight,  to  focus  the  use  of  the  Space  Shuttle  on  completing 
assembly  of  the  International  Space  Station,  to  retire  the  Space  Shuttle  by  2010, 
and to replace it as soon as possible thereafter with the new Crew Exploration Vehi-
cle  (CEV).  Given  the  importance  of  ensuring  that  the  Space  Shuttle  is  returned  to 
flight  safely,  the  Space  Shuttle  program  and,  indeed,  the  whole  of  NASA  has  been 
devoting  its  available  resources  and  human  capital  to  ensuring  that  this  first  step 
is  executed  to  the  best  of  our  abilities.  Once  the  two  Return  to  Flight  missions  are 
behind  us  and  we  have  developed  a  higher  level  of  confidence  in  the  knowledge  of 
the Shuttle debris environment, we can focus a greater level of attention on the im-
portant  issues  surrounding  Space  Shuttle  transition  and  the  development  of  the 
next generation of human spaceflight vehicles. 
Space Shuttle Return to Flight 

On April 28, 2005, the Space Shuttle program management recommended that we 
extend our planning for the first Return to Flight mission, STS–114, to support the 
launch window that opens in July 2005. I concurred with this recommendation. This 
change  was  not  the  result  of  any  single  problem,  but  instead  reflected  the  need  to 
take  additional  time  to  perform  our  verification  and  validation  reviews,  and  to  as-
sess  the  results  from  the  External  Tank  (ET)  fueling  test  performed  on  April  14, 
2005.  We  knew  that  there  were  some  open  questions  going  into  these  reviews  and 
tests, and we had very detailed plans for developing answers to those questions. We 
also  understood  that  the  reviews  and  tests  might  raise  additional  questions  before 
Return  to  Flight,  and  that  we  would  have  to  be  prepared  to  review  our  plans  and 
launch  opportunities  in  light  of  this.  That  is  exactly  what  happened.  One  of  the 
most  notable  outcomes  was  our  decision  to  modify  the  feed  line  bellows  area  with 
an  electrically  powered  heater  to  further  reduce  or  eliminate  the  ice  that  naturally 
forms in the area. 

This  decision  to  insert  some  additional  planning  time  to  support  a  mid-July 
launch  opportunity  was  not  made  lightly.  Everyone  in  the  Space  Shuttle  program 
recognizes that we have an extremely important mission to carry out, and that com-
pleting  assembly  of  the  International  Space  Station  and  executing  the  Vision  for 
Space Exploration cannot happen until we return the Space Shuttle to flight. At the 
same  time,  this  change  reflects  our  continuing  commitment  to  remain  focused  on 
safety of flight considerations and prudent engineering decisions. Transporting peo-
ple  into  space  remains  risky  compared  to  most  other  human  endeavors.  We  must 
make  sure  that  every  decision  to  send  people  on  missions  into  space  is  made  with 
the utmost concern for their safety. 

Today,  work  continues  in  preparation  for  another  ET  tanking  test  scheduled  for 
as early as tomorrow, May 19, while the STS–114 Shuttle stack is still at its launch 
pad. Engineers and technicians are adding instrumentation to the tank to help trou-
bleshoot  two  problems  that  were  detected  during  its  first  tanking  test  on  April  14. 
The instrumentation will provide data to further analyze and diagnose the cause for 
these  two  problems:  the  liquid  hydrogen  sensors  that  gave  intermittent  readings 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

and  the  liquid  hydrogen  pressurization  relief  valve  that  cycled  more  times  than 
standard  during  last  month’s  test.  Following  the  tanking  test,  technicians  will  pre-
pare  for  rolling  back  Discovery  to  the  Vehicle  Assembly  Building  (VAB)  no  earlier 
than  May  24.  In  the  VAB,  Discovery  will  be  removed  from  its  ET  and  lowered  into 
the transfer aisle. 

It  has  taken  an  extraordinary  effort  to  return  the  Space  Shuttle  fleet  to  flight 
readiness status. One hundred and sixteen individual hardware modifications (41 of 
which  were  directly  related  to  the  15  Return  to  Flight  recommendations  of  the  Co-
lumbia  Accident  Investigation  Board  [CAIB])  and  over  3.5  million  work-hours  have 
gone  into  Return  to  Flight,  raising  the  bar,  and  launch  processing  activities  on 
Space Shuttle Discovery alone. Our Return to Flight effort has been focused on iden-
tifying  hazards,  re-designing  current  systems  to  eliminate  or  control  those  hazards, 
providing  means  for  warning  that  hazards  might  have  occurred  during  flight,  and 
emplacing standardized special procedures to counter any hazardous conditions that 
might arise. We have eliminated the External Tank bipod foam which was the prox-
imate cause of the Space Shuttle Columbia accident on February 1, 2003. The crews 
on  board  Discovery  and  the  International  Space  Station  will  now  be  able  to  detect 
critical  damage  to  the  Space  Shuttle’s  thermal  protection  system  during  the  first 
two development test flights and, in the unexpected event of severe damage, to take 
shelter  in  the  International  Space  Station  until  a  rescue  mission  can  be  launched. 
We  have  gone  well  beyond  the  recommendations  of  the  CAIB  to  reduce  risks  and 
provide additional safety measures through added hardware improvements and pro-
cedural changes. 

Return  to  Flight  has  been  a  massive  effort,  focusing  the  energies  of  every  tech-
nical  discipline  across  all  the  NASA  Centers  and  Space  Shuttle  contractors  on  a 
very  specific  objective.  It  has  been,  in  short,  an  example  of  NASA  at  its  finest.  I 
am very proud of this Space Shuttle team and this Agency for their hard work, their 
diligence,  and  their  incomparable  expertise  and  professionalism  during  these  dif-
ficult times. 

But  returning  the  Space  Shuttle  fleet  to  flight  status  is  only  the  first  step  in  the 
Nation’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  Over  the  next  few  years,  the  Space  Shuttle 
fleet  will  resume  executing  some  of  the  most  complex  missions  ever  attempted  in 
space. The return to Space Shuttle operations means that NASA can once again re-
turn to assembly of the International Space Station. The first two Space Shuttle Re-
turn  to  Flight  missions,  STS–114  and  STS–121,  are  development  test  and  logistics 
missions which will focus on carrying cargo to the Station and thoroughly exercising 
the  extensive  hardware  and  process  changes  made  during  the  past  27  months.  Fol-
lowing those two flights, the crew of STS–115 will resume the assembly of the Inter-
national  Space  Station.  We  will  complete  assembly  of  the  International  Space  Sta-
tion using the minimum number of Space Shuttle flights necessary. 
Space Shuttle Transition—Scope 

As  the  Space  Shuttle  resumes  its  mission,  NASA  will  begin  tackling  an  equally 
challenging assignment—ensuring a safe and orderly retirement of the Space Shut-
tle system by 2010 and a graceful transition of the Space Shuttle knowledge, work-
force,  and  assets  to  future  exploration  missions.  We  need  to  maintain  a  robust  pro-
gram  that  is  capable  of  safely  executing  the  remaining  Space  Shuttle  missions 
while,  at  the  same  time,  not  displacing  the  orderly  pursuit  of  necessary  transition 
activities. 

This  effort  could  very  well  be  one  of  the  largest  single  planned  transitions  NASA 
(or  any  federal  agency)  has  ever  undertaken.  The  Space  Shuttle  program  occupies 
640 facilities, utilizes over 900,000 equipment line items, and directly employs over 
2,000  civil  servants  and  more  than  15,000  work-year-equivalent  prime  contractors, 
with an additional 3,000 people working indirectly on Space Shuttle activities at all 
NASA  Centers.  Thousands  more  are  employed  at  the  subcontractor  level  in  43 
states  across  the  country.  The  total  equipment  value  held  by  the  Program  is  over 
$12 billion. The total facilities value held by the Program is approximately $5.7 bil-
lion (approximately one-third of the value of NASA’s entire facility inventory), most-
ly  at  the  field  centers.  There  are  also  approximately  1,500  active  suppliers  and 
3,000–4,000 qualified suppliers that directly support the Space Shuttle program. 

Of  all  these  assets,  the  most  important  are,  of  course,  the  people.  Space  Shuttle 
transition  will  have  an  unavoidable  impact  on  NASA’s  workforce.  The  early  transi-
tion  of  workforce  elements,  the  need  to  retain  segments  of  that  workforce,  and  the 
transition of program knowledge to future programs must all be addressed. We will 
ensure  that  this  transition  treats  these  dedicated  people  with  the  respect  they  de-
serve, and that their knowledge and experience will be captured or converted as we 
begin  the  next  phase  of  exploration.  There  will  be  challenges,  but  we  will  ensure 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

that  critical  skills  are  retained  for  safe  mission  execution  through  the  operational 
life of the program. 

NASA  and  the  Space  Shuttle  program  will  also  face  significant  challenges  in 
terms of balancing different technical and programmatic requirements: (1) maintain-
ing access to the necessary equipment, facilities, and vendors needed through Space 
Shuttle flyout; (2) identifying and maintaining those capabilities that may be needed 
for  next-generation  exploration  systems  activities,  and;  (3)  retiring  unneeded  capa-
bilities  to  free  resources  that  will  support  future  exploration.  For  example,  because 
the  amount  of  flight  hardware  accumulated  (including  spares)  will  be  sufficient  to 
meet  the  current  mission  manifest  through  2010,  several  key  Space  Shuttle  hard-
ware  vendors  and  sub-tier  suppliers  will  be  ending  their  relationship  with  the  pro-
gram prior to 2010. Draw-down decisions need to be made with regard to equipment 
and facilities which currently support (and are supported by) the Space Shuttle pro-
gram. These resources will need to be characterized and dispositioned in such a way 
that either supports exploration goals or removes them from NASA’s books. 

Many  of  these  decisions  depend  upon  the  role  that  Space  Shuttle  knowledge, 
workforce,  hardware,  and  infrastructure  will  play  in  follow-on  launch  vehicles. 
NASA  is  continuing  to  analyze  next-generation  crew  and  heavy-lift  launch  require-
ments in support of the Vision for Space Exploration, including the degree to which 
those  requirements  could  be  met  by  boosters  derived  from  existing  Space  Shuttle 
propulsion  components  and  systems.  Flight-proven  Space  Shuttle  propulsion  ele-
ments  (including  the  Space  Shuttle  Main  Engines,  the  Solid  Rocket  Boosters,  and 
the External Tank, as well as some of the existing Space Shuttle infrastructure and 
workforce) will be carefully evaluated, as their use may enable more rapid develop-
ment of crew and heavy lift capability than other alternatives like Evolved Expend-
able  Launch  Vehicles  (Delta  IV  and  Atlas  V).  A  decision  to  use  Space  Shuttle  pro-
pulsion  elements  as  part  of  our  next-generation  space  transportation  architecture 
would  have  a  significant  impact  on  Space  Shuttle  transition  planning.  However, 
since  these  launch  vehicle  requirements  are  not  yet  fully  defined,  current  Space 
Shuttle  transition  planning  must  take  into  account  the  risks  of  prematurely  termi-
nating  Space  Shuttle  vendors  and  retiring  equipment  and  facilities  that  could  pos-
sibly be needed to fulfill these requirements. 

Space Shuttle transition will also be affected by the number and pacing of flights 
needed  to  complete  assembly  of  the  International  Space  Station.  NASA  is  also  cur-
rently  examining  alternative  configurations  for  the  Space  Station  that  meet  the 
goals  of  the  Vision  and  the  needs  of  our  international  partners,  while  requiring  as 
few  Shuttle  flights  as  possible  to  complete  assembly.  This  effort  will  be  a  factor  in 
the  formulation  of  NASA’s  FY  2007  budget,  and  we  will  keep  Congressional  Com-
mittees informed as the study effort progresses. 

I  believe  that  Space  Shuttle  transition  will  be  one  of  the  largest,  most  complex, 
and  most  emotionally-charged  tasks  facing  NASA  during  the  initial  phases  of  the 
Vision. It cannot be started too soon. 
Space Shuttle Transition—Processes 

The single most important requirement in Space Shuttle transition is to maintain 
the  highest  level  of  flight  and  ground  safety  through  the  life  of  the  Program.  The 
last flight of the Space Shuttle must be just as safe as the upcoming Return to Flight 
missions. The success of Space Shuttle transition will also depend upon serving the 
goals of the Vision for Space Exploration in such a way that takes maximum advan-
tage  of  existing  programs  and  personnel,  minimizes  the  negative  impacts  of  transi-
tion  on  Space  Shuttle  team  morale  and  performance,  and  ensures  full  compliance 
with all relevant federal, state, and local laws and standards. 

Our  transition  planning  began  soon  after  the  release  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Ex-
ploration  a  year  ago.  While  our  efforts  over  the  past  2  years  have  been  dedicated 
to  Return  to  Flight,  NASA  has  also  concluded  the  exploratory  phase  of  its  Space 
Shuttle  transition  activities  and  has  begun  to  set  out  the  next  steps  in  transition 
planning.  We  have  benchmarked  phaseouts  in  other  high-technology,  systems-in-
tense  programs,  including  the  ongoing  retirement  of  the  Titan  IV  program,  which 
just had its final launch out of Cape Canaveral on April 29, 2005. The Space Shuttle 
program  has  also  asked  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  (NAPA)  to 
assist  us  in  our  transition  activities,  particularly  in  the  development  of  strategies 
and  plans  for  the  transition  from  the  Space  Shuttle  program  to  the  programs  that 
will implement the Vision for Space Exploration. 

Through  the  recent  Integrated  Space  Operations  Summit  this  past  March,  NASA 
engaged a broad community on a number of issues affecting both the Space Shuttle 
and  International  Space  Station  programs.  For  this  past  year’s  annual  Summit, 
NASA chartered one panel specifically to study Space Shuttle transition. That panel 
considered  several  programs,  including  the  Titan  IV,  and  developed  recommenda-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

tions  intended  to  lay  the  foundation  for  managing  Space  Shuttle  transition  activi-
ties.  In  accordance  with  these  recommendations,  the  Space  Operations  Mission  Di-
rectorate  will  establish  the  position  of  Space  Transportation  System  Transition 
Manager. The initial efforts of this manager will be to develop the planning as rec-
ommended  by  the  Transition  Panel  and  to  look  for  candidate  areas  for  transition 
from  the  Space  Shuttle  program.  We  will  select  an  individual  to  fill  this  position 
shortly. 

The  Space  Shuttle  program  recognizes  the  importance  of  maintaining  an  experi-
enced  workforce  to  safely  execute  the  Space  Shuttle’s  mission  through  the  end  of 
the  decade.  The  NASA  Workforce  Flexibility  Act  of  2004  provides  the  Agency  with 
vital  tools,  such  as  the  authority  to  provide  workforce  retention  bonuses  in  critical 
skill areas, that will help retain the necessary human capital needed during mission 
execution.  NASA  has  nine  panels  and  teams  looking  at  workforce  issues  across  the 
Agency,  in  addition  to  the  Integrated  Space  Operations  Summit  Transition  Panel’s 
workforce assessment. We have also invited human capital experts from government 
and  private  industry  to  advise  us  on  best  practices  during  Space  Shuttle  program 
phaseout. 

Many of our contractor partners have begun taking steps (such as defining critical 
skill  requirements  and  bringing  in  human  capital  consulting  firms)  to  counter  the 
impact  of  transition  on  mission  execution.  Provisions  in  the  follow-on  to  the  Space 
Flight  Operations  Contract  (which  runs  through  September  2006)  will  require  the 
prime  Space  Shuttle  operations  contractor,  United  Space  Alliance,  to  prepare  for 
sustaining  its  required  workforce,  including  submitting  a  critical  skills  retention 
plan. 
Accelerating the Crew Exploration Vehicle 

A  cornerstone  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  is  a  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle 
(CEV)  and  its  associated  launch  system.  The  CEV  will  be  developed  in  the  latter 
part of this decade and deployed operationally as soon as possible. The primary mis-
sion of the CEV will be the exploration of the Moon and other destinations, but ini-
tially it will conduct missions in Earth orbit, including missions to the International 
Space Station. 

Our  earlier  plans  called  for  operational  deployment  of  the  CEV  not  later  than 
2014. As I testified during my confirmation hearing, I believe that the CEV develop-
ment  must  be  accelerated  in  order  to  minimize  the  gap  between  the  2010  Space 
Shuttle retirement and the first operational flight of the CEV. NASA has embarked 
upon a rigorous review of the Crew Exploration Vehicle (CEV) architecture to deter-
mine  opportunities  to  accelerate  the  availability  of  the  CEV.  This  assessment  is  a 
part of the ‘‘Exploration Systems Architecture Study’’ (ESAS), which I chartered on 
April  29,  2005.  The  product  of  this  analysis  is  anticipated  by  mid-July  2005.  Accel-
eration  of  the  CEV  program  will  be  facilitated  by  down-selecting  to  a  single  con-
tractor sooner than originally planned, and by deferring other elements of the explo-
ration  systems  research  and  technology  plan,  like  demonstration  of  nuclear  electric 
propulsion, not required for the CEV or for the early phases of human return to the 
Moon. 

The CEV will conduct missions in Earth orbit, including missions to the ISS, but 
its  primary  mission  will  be  to  support  exploration  of  the  Moon  and  other  destina-
tions.  In  addition,  NASA’s  Exploration  Systems  Mission  Directorate  will  be  respon-
sible  for  developing  and  acquiring  crew  and  cargo  services  to  support  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station,  and  funds  have  been  transferred  to  that  Directorate,  as  re-
flected in the May update to the FY 2005 Operating Plan. 

NASA  needs  to  communicate  our  view  of  the  CEV  launch  architecture  and  our 
requirements,  and  we  will  keep  Congressional  Committees  informed  as  the  ESAS 
study  effort  progresses.  Going  forward,  the  Agency  will  need  a  launch  system  for 
the  CEV,  one  which  does  not  at  present  exist.  Two  obvious  possibilities  exist  by 
which  we  might  obtain  such  a  vehicle.  The  first  is  to  develop  a  launch  system  de-
rived  from  Shuttle  components,  specifically  the  SRB  with  a  new  upper  stage.  The 
second  option  is  to  upgrade  the  proposed  heavy-lift  versions  of  EELV,  again  in  all 
likelihood with a new upper stage. As NASA Administrator, I must be a responsible 
steward  of  our  funds,  and  a  key  aspect  of  the  Agency’s  analysis  of  alternatives  will 
be to capitalize on existing technical and workforce assets in a cost-effective and ef-
ficient way. NASA’s goal is to develop a CEV capable of operating safely soon after 
the retirement of the Space Shuttle. 
Summary 

Space Shuttle transition represents an enormous challenge for NASA and for the 
Nation as a whole. While we have benchmarked other programs that are similar in 
scope  to  the  Space  Shuttle,  the  Shuttle  is  one  of  the  largest  single  programs  for 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

which  an  orderly  transition  to  disposal  has  ever  been  required.  I  do  not  want,  and 
we  should  not  want,  to  repeat  the  mistakes  made  in  the  aftermath  of  the  Apollo 
program,  where  many  unique  capabilities  were  shut  down  abruptly  and 
irretrievably. We must transition the Space Shuttle in a way that ensures continued 
safety in our ongoing operations, maximizes the efficiency with which we utilize our 
resources, respects the Space Shuttle workforce, and protects critical national capa-
bilities  that  will  be  needed  to  support  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  There  will 
be  hard  decisions  to  be  made  over  the  next  5  years.  It  is  vital,  however,  that  we 
remain focused on the worthy and ambitious goals laid out by the President on Jan-
uary 14, 2004. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today,  and  I  look  forward  to  responding 

to any questions you may have.

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  am  so  sorry  we  are  having  to  do  this 
quickly, because there is so much that we have to say and we have 
a great second panel, as well. 

But  let  me  ask  you  first,  if  I  were  to  ask  you  what  are  the  top 
priorities  for  the  use  of  the  Space  Station,  the  research  that  you 
would  do  at  the  Space  Station  right  now,  what  would  those  three 
priorities be? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  The  Space  Station  is  very  useful  as  a  test  bed  for 
hardware  that  we  will  be  developing  for  exploration.  Much  of  that 
hardware that we intend to take to the Moon and later on to other 
destinations  would  be  better  flight  tested  in  lower  orbit  close  to 
home.  One  does  not  require  that  such  hardware  be  tested  on  a 
space station, but given that we have one, that would be the logical 
place to do it. 

There will be, as the years evolve, there will be a number of sci-
entific  experiments  that  can  be  palatized  and  can  be  attached  to 
the  Space  Station,  as  opposed  to  necessarily  being  on  a  free-flying 
spacecraft. Again, if we did not have a Space Station, we might do 
otherwise.  But  having  one,  we  will  look  for  opportunities  to  use  it. 
There  will  be  research  that  can  be  conducted  on  the  station  by 
the  virtue  of  the  ability  of  the  station  to  provide  an  extended  zero 
gravity time. Response of human and other organisms to zero grav-
ity can be examined under controlled conditions on the station. 

The  station  is  limited  in  its  research  potential  by  the  fact  that 
we are not able on the station to combine the appropriate radiation 
spectrum  for  deep  space  flight  together  with  the  zero  G  environ-
ment. 

It is those two environments together that are the truly relevant 
environment.  And  we  cannot  mimic  those.  But  we  can  at  least 
mimic the zero G portion. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  There  is  a  consortium  of  universities  now 
that  takes  the  medical  research  that  can  benefit  from  being  per-
formed  in  space  and  that  decides  what  the  priorities  are  and  then 
expands on those. Do you foresee within your budget being able to 
continue  that  consortium  doing  the  medical  side  of  the  research 
that is going on at the Space Station? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Given the priorities that I have stated, that the Ad-
ministration  has  supported,  and  that  I  believe  are  shared  by  this 
Committee,  the  short  answer  to  your  question  is  not  in  full  scope. 
In  order  of  priorities,  I  need  to  complete  the  return  of  the  Space 
Shuttle to flight and fly every flight safely. 

We  need  to  complete  the  assembly  of  the  International  Space 
Station.  Deferring  it  will  likely  only  cost  more  money.  We  need, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

very much need, as you have said, to bring the CEV on line sooner 
rather than later, minimizing the gap in human space flight. 

One of the few areas of freedom that I have as the administrator 
is  the,  I  hesitate  to  call  it  a  pot,  but  the  pot  of  research  and  tech-
nology  money  that  can  be,  if  you  will,  bought  by  the  yard.  That  is 
one  of  the  few  areas  where  I  have  any  flexibility  at  all.  If  I  am  to 
accelerate the development of the CEV, a good chunk of that money 
must be used to do so. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Would  you  provide  for  me  and  the  Com-
mittee  a  cost  estimate  of  what  the  biological  research,  the  medical 
research,  is,  even  if  it  is  scaled  back  perhaps?  But  what  about  the 
ongoing  experiments  that  we  have  heard  about  on  breast  cancer 
tissue?  I  would  imagine  that  even  in  your  top  priorities,  the  zero 
gravity  conditions  still  allow  you  to  look  at  the  osteoporosis  effects 
on  humans  and—so  that  these  would  be  continuing  areas  of  the 
medical  research  that  would  also  be  in  your  top  priority  list.  But 
could  you  also  tell  us  what  it  would  cost  to  do  the  other  types  of 
research that can be done in zero gravity uniquely and are part of 
the  university-based  research  consortium  so  we  have  an  idea  of 
what that budget is? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  Senator,  we  will.  And  I  will  indicate  to  you 
what  our  priorities  would  be  for  the  research  that  would  continue 
and  what  we  would  plan  to  delay  or  defer  in  order  to  accelerate 
CEV. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  That  would  be  very  helpful.  My  last  ques-
tion in this round would be, obviously you are focusing on the CEV. 
You have said that the Shuttle itself is flawed, perhaps because of 
the  heavy  payload.  I  don’t  know  all  of  the  reasons  why.  But  my 
question  is  this:  How  do  you  propose  and  what  is  your  priority 
ranking  for  getting  payload  to  the  Space  Station  or  perhaps  even 
beyond to the Moon, if that is necessary, if you do not have a Shut-
tle that can carry payload? How do you plan to do that? And what 
are  you—where  is  that  in  your  priority  list  when  you  do  not  have 
a Shuttle anymore? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Senator,  that  is  an  excellent  question.  Thank  you. 
Of course, we have been getting cargo to the Space Station for the 
last  two-plus  years  while  the  Shuttle  has  been  grounded,  through 
the  good  offices  of  our  Russian  partner,  with  a  series  of  progress 
flights.  The  progress  system  is  limited  in  capacity,  but  it  does  fea-
ture  the  capability  to  do  an  automated  proximity  operations  flight 
plan  and  automated  rendezvous  and  docking  with  the  Space  Sta-
tion. 

The  United  States  needs  to  develop  that  capability,  and  we  will 
be  doing  so.  Later  this  summer,  perhaps  early  fall,  we  will  be  re-
leasing  an  RFP  in  the  crew  and  cargo  line—I  think  you  will  find 
that in our budget—that is intended specifically to address the pro-
vision of Space Station cargo resupply, up-mass, if you will, by com-
mercial means, commercial contracts to all carriers. 

In  addition,  the  Exploration  Systems  Architecture  Study  (ESAS) 
we are doing over the summer will define a path by which the gov-
ernment can meet government requirements for cargo to Space Sta-
tion,  should  commercial  providers  fail  to  show  up.  So  we  will  have 
two paths. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

Going forward, our budget baseline will assume that commercial 
cargo  carriers  will  be  able  to  provide  those  services  to  the  station. 
Senator HUTCHISON. So bottom line, you do intend for us to have 
some  capability,  besides  depending  on  any  other  partner,  for  that 
responsibility. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Absolutely. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Madame Chairman. 
What  happens  if  the  CEV  is  not  ready  by  2010  when  your  plan 

is to scrap the Shuttle? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. It is my job to convince you that we will have a de-
velopment  plan  for  CEV  that  has  it  ready  by  2010,  or  as  soon 
thereafter  as  we  can  we  will  say  the  date  and  we  will  try  to  hold 
to it. I will try to convince you, as we go through the next few years 
together,  that  we  are  holding  to  that  plan.  In  part,  the  definition 
of what the CEV is needs to be done with the constraint that it be 
buildable,  that  it  be  an  executable  program  and  can  be  fielded 
shortly after the Shuttle’s retirement. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  in  that  plan  would  be  the  plan  for  the  or-

derly transition from one to the other? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Exactly. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  Of  course  at  that  point,  we  assume  that  the 
Space  Station  would  be  up  in  full  bloom  and  running  with  a  com-
plete  complement  of  astronauts  doing  research.  Therein  is  another 
reason  why  we  need  the  follow-on  vehicle  ready,  so  that  there  is 
not  this  hiatus.  Given  the  fact  of  our  experience  back  in  1975  in 
the  last  Apollo,  it  was  Apollo–Soyuz,  we  thought  we  were  going  to 
fly  the  Space  Shuttle  in  about  1978.  And  it  did  not  fly  until  1981. 
A part of that work force was effectively utilized so that they did 
not  have  to  lay  them  off  and  that  that  corporate  memory  was  all 
there.  What  are  your  plans,  what  is  your  thinking  about,  if  there 
did  occur  this  hiatus,  of  how  you  would  keep  that  team  together? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Senator,  I  lived  through  that  period  as  a  working 
engineer  and  remember  it  well.  It  is  not  one  of  my  more  pleasant 
memories  from  my  35  years  in  the  space  business.  So  one  of  the 
reasons  I  so  strongly  support  the  concerns  which  have  been  ex-
pressed about minimizing that gap in human space flight capability 
is that I frankly do not want to live through that experience twice. 
Our primary contractor in Space Shuttle, space flight, launch op-
erations,  launch  preparations  is,  of  course,  the  United  Space  Alli-
ance.  We  work  with  that  contractor  every  day,  every  week.  We 
have  very  close  ties  with  them.  We  are  pleased  with  the  work.  It 
is  our  goal  going  forward  in  developing  a  transition  plan  from 
Shuttle to CEV to be hand in glove with our USA contractor to ef-
fect the most orderly transition that we can. 

As  I  said  briefly  in  my  opening  statement,  we  have  studied  les-
sons learned from the Titan IV transition. We have gone back and 
studied  lessons  learned  from  the  Saturn  Apollo  to  Shuttle  transi-
tion.  Some  of  those  lessons  are  good  ones  and  some  are  things  to 
be avoided. We are paying attention. 

There are two basic issues. Any launch system—I referred earlier 
to the fact of, the known fact of, it takes about $4.5 billion to keep 
the  Shuttle  going  whether  you  fly  any  flights  or  not.  The  new  sys-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

tem must have lower fixed costs or we, the United States, will not 
have  effected  any  improvement.  Lower  fixed  cost  means  a  smaller 
work  force  in  the  sense  of  a  standing  army.  So  we  want  to  shift 
money from what it takes merely to launch payloads into more ex-
citing and new things that we want to do. So some work force will 
be transitioned going forward and other elements of the work force 
must  be  transitioned  to  new  activities.  Otherwise  we  would  do 
nothing new. 

That  program  must  be  managed  as  carefully  and  in  as  much  of 
a forward-looking sense as we possibly can. That is our every inten-
tion. 

Senator NELSON. And an additional computation here is that you 
will  have  a  full-up,  robust,  internationally  participated  in  Space 
Station  that  you  want  to  utilize.  And  suddenly,  if  you  stop  the 
Shuttle  and  you  do  not  have  the  follow-on  vehicle  to  service  that 
Space  Station,  you  cannot  use  all  of  that  investment  of  multiple 
tens  of  billions  of  dollars  up  in  the  heavens.  For  example,  what 
would  we  use  as  a  lifeboat?  I  guess  we  would  have  to  use  the 
Soyuz. Well, then therefore, you have to drop the level of the crew 
so  you  are  not  using  that  super  structure  up  there  that  we  have 
invested so much in. 

What is your thinking there? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  cannot  but  agree  with  you.  If  we  have  a  station, 
we  need  to  be  able  to  use  it.  I  do  not  know  how  to  say  in  enough 
different  ways  that  I  am  convinced  that  your  concern  about  mini-
mizing such gaps in access are on target. We at NASA are working 
to eliminate that and to provide a credible plan for doing so. 

Senator NELSON. Well, I commend you on what you have already 
done,  which  is  accelerate  the  CEV  and  see  if  that  is  doable.  But 
that then begs my next statement, which is, if it cannot be acceler-
ated, then maybe it is in the interest of the United States to extend 
the Shuttle. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Sir, if we do that, then we face the circular problem. 
I  have  a  hole  in  my  gas  tank,  but  the  money  I  have  to  spend  buy-
ing  the  gasoline  prevents  me  from  paying  the  mechanic  to  fix  the 
tank. 

Senator NELSON. Well, then——
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  have  to  retire  the  Shuttle  in  order  to  have  the 

money to do the things that you and I both want to do. 

Senator  NELSON.  Understandably.  But  if  the  development  CEV 
does  not  occur  in  the  expeditious  way  that  you  hope  and  that  you 
are  giving  leadership  to,  and  we  commend  you  for  that,  you  have 
to  have  a  plan  B.  Otherwise  we  are  going  to  waste  all  that  asset 
up there. 

Just  a  concluding  thought  here,  Madame  Chairman.  In  a  pre-
vious  hearing  we  had  brand  new  testimony  about  the  promise,  for 
example, that I did not know of the experiments that are going on 
on  protein  crystal  growths,  experiments  that  were  made  20  years 
ago and of which there was some question of whether or not it was 
financially feasible to do that in orbit, as opposed to on Earth. But 
now  that  we  are  seeing  new  promise,  as  was  the  testimony,  I  still 
have  not  received  those  answers.  And  I  would  like  this  statement 
to NASA, please get those answers back to me. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

But  if  there  is  that  promise  of  medical  breakthroughs  on  such 
things  as  protein  crystal  growth  on  orbit,  then  that  is  just  all  the 
more reason why we need to keep that International Space Station 
functioning. 

Thank you. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. I agree. 
I would like another round, but we are told that we have to end 
at  11:30.  And  therefore,  I  am  going  to  ask  you  to  come  back  and 
see  us  very  soon  and  stay  in  touch  with  us.  And  we  will  call  our 
second panel. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I am at your disposal. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Thank you. 
[Pause.] 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  OK.  If  you  would,  I  would  like  to  ask  you, 
since  we  are  on  a  very  tight  timeframe,  if  you  would  each  speak 
2  minutes,  summarize  all  of  your  statements  with  your  major 
points. And then we will have a few minutes left for questions. 

I would like to first ask Mr. Michael McCulley, who is the Presi-

dent and Chief Executive Officer of United Space Alliance. 
STATEMENT OF MICHAEL J. MCCULLEY, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

UNITED SPACE ALLIANCE 

Mr.  MCCULLEY.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  on  this 
very  important  subject.  It  is  my  privilege  to  be  representing  the 
10,000-plus  men  and  women  of  the  United  States  Alliance.  And  I 
can  tell  you  that  virtually  everything  we  are  doing  these  days  is 
focused on supporting NASA in the Return to Flight effort. 

But having said that, we all realized when the President gave his 
vision  speech  last  January,  there  would  be  a  new  world  for  USA 
and that was this world of transition. And so within minutes of the 
speech,  we  started  transition  planning.  It  goes  on  today.  It  is  a 
transition that must be carefully and proactively managed and led. 
NASA  and  USA  have  taken  measures  to  address  that  transition 
in  terms  of  workforce,  facilities,  hardware,  equipment,  test  assets, 
and  also  the  supplier  base.  The  GAO  has  also  weighed  in  on  this. 
And  I  will  not  quote,  as  I  was  going  to  do,  but  they  have  done  an 
excellent initial report on our efforts to start managing this transi-
tion. 

In  addition,  NASA  and  the  NASA  industry  partnership  through 
the Space Operations Summit have also begun transition planning, 
including all of those things that I mentioned earlier. It also would 
include  retention,  recruitment  of  critical  skills,  how  we  dispose  or 
preserve the assets. It has resulted in some changes in the Shuttle 
program  office  that  are  proactive  attempts  to  get  a  jump  on  this 
transition. 

In addition, over the years, USA, owned by Boeing and Lockheed 
Martin, has had excellent results in previous times when there has 
been either an overage or a shortage on one company’s part or the 
other.  We  have  developed  a  really  good  procedure  of  transferring 
employees  back  and  forth.  We  have  used  it  very  successfully.  And 
I would anticipate that we will have that in the future, as well. 

In  addition,  Dr.  Griffin  mentioned  the  Titan  program.  I  have 
been  paying  very  close  attention  to  the  Titan  program,  which  flew 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

its  last  flight  in  Florida  last  month,  I  have  met  with  the  con-
tracting  officers  to  understand  what  the  Air  Force  did  with  Lock-
heed Martin is in contract to make changes to retain critical skills 
through  the  last  flight.  The  Space  Flight  Operations  Contract  has 
a  follow-on  provision  that  we  are  working  on  now  with  NASA.  I 
would  anticipate  that  NASA  would  require  us  in  that  contract  to 
do  more  proactive  planning  on  how  we  are  going  to  work  our  way 
through  this  transition  and  to  insure  that  the  last  Space  Shuttle 
flight is just as safe as the next Space Shuttle flight. 

Of  course,  the  execution  and  timing  of  all  these  measures  de-
pends  on  a  number  of  different  things,  and  a  number  of  different 
requirements.  I  am  sitting  here  with  a  great  deal  of  uncertainty 
right  now,  but  I  am  pleased  that  Dr.  Griffin  has  put  his  teams  in 
place  and  has  said  the  summertime  is  their  deadline.  So  I  antici-
pate  by  the  summer  or  the  fall  I  will  have  a  much  better  idea  of 
what  I  need  to  do  with  specific  goals,  requirements  and  planning 
horizons. 

You  had  asked  about  the  industrial  base  and  asked  me  to  com-
ment on that. It is a great question, because many of the skills and 
certifications  that  are  in  the  Shuttle  program  are  unique  to  that 
program. As we begin to fly down, we have a vendor base out there 
that we have to carefully manage. Some of their contracts have op-
tions  like  lifetime  buys  on  materials  or  products.  Other  times  we 
do not have that option. 

For  example,  the  United  Technologies  Company  builds  the  fuel 
cells  for  the  Space  Shuttle.  Well,  we  are  not  going  to  order  any 
more  fuel  cells.  So  we  are  a  very  small  part  of  their  business.  But 
I  need  that  skill  set  in  place  up  until  the  last  landing  on  the  last 
flight.  And  so  our  contractual  arrangements  need  to  reflect  that. 
And so it changes our contracts and the way we manage contracts. 
We are also working that proactively. 

In  summary,  we  were  created  for  one  customer,  and  that  is 
NASA.  I  have  10,000-plus  experts,  including  myself  and  my  man-
agement team, focused on supporting that customer. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. McCulley follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL J. MCCULLEY, PRESIDENT AND CEO, UNITED 

SPACE ALLIANCE 

Madam  Chairwoman,  Ranking  Member  Nelson,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I 
am  Mike  McCulley,  the  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  the  United  Space 
Alliance (USA). 

Thank you for giving me the opportunity to address the Subcommittee on current 
Space Shuttle operations and the timing and scope of the planned retirement of the 
fleet. 

It  is  my  privilege  to  represent  the  10,400  men  and  woman  of  USA  located  pri-

marily in Texas, Florida, and Alabama. 

USA is responsible for the day-to-day operations of NASA’s Space Shuttle system, 
excluding  the  propulsions  elements  managed  by  the  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center. 
USA was formed in 1996 through consolidation of 29 Shuttle contracts into one sin-
gle contract and organization. 

The  foremost  focus  of  USA  and  its  employees  today  is  the  safe  return  to  flight 
of  the  Shuttle.  Beyond  this  imperative,  we  are  also  working  with  our  NASA  cus-
tomer to face the reality of Shuttle retirement and do the necessary planning to en-
sure an efficient, timely and prudent transition to the CEV. 

As  the  Subcommittee  Members  are  aware,  the  current  exploration  plan  contains 
a gap in U.S. human space flight capability between the projected retirement of the 
Shuttle  and  the  availability  of  a  fully  operational  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle  (CEV) 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

and  its  new  launch  system.  This  so  called  gap  has  a  number  of  associated  issues 
including  U.S.  reliance  on  foreign  nations  for  human  access  to  space,  the  need  for 
a  heavy-lift  cargo  launch  capability  for  cargo  to  and  from  the  International  Space 
Station,  the  potential  loss  of  vital  workforce  skills  and  experience,  and  related  im-
pacts to the U.S. industrial base. 

Retention  of  the  critical  skills  required  to  fly  safely  and  successfully  throughout 
the remaining life of the Shuttle program and the ability to transition those workers 
with the necessary skills and competencies to the next generation of launch vehicles, 
remains  a  top  priority  for  NASA  and  USA.  The  new  NASA  Administrator,  Dr.  Mi-
chael Griffin, has testified that he has established an Exploration Systems Architec-
ture Study team to examine ways to accelerate the development of the Crew Explo-
ration Vehicles in order to minimize any gap in the U.S. capability for human space 
flight. 

USA understands and fully appreciates the need to plan for the future of our criti-
cally  important  workforce  and  has  taken  steps  to  develop  such  a  plan.  We  are  also 
working with NASA on all aspects of transition planning including: workforce, facili-
ties, hardware, equipment, test assets, and supplier base. 
Transition 

There  are  over  20,000  NASA  and  contractor  employees  working  on  the  Shuttle 
Program.  As  the  Shuttle  is  retired,  it  is  expected  that  a  number  of  contractor  and 
civil  servant  employees  will  initiate  personal  retirement,  while  a  number  will  re-
main,  to  continue  to  support  human  space  flight  by  moving  to  the  new  exploration 
programs. However, as currently envisioned, the number of employees available for 
this  opportunity  could  be  limited  both  by  the  gap  between  Shuttle  retirement  and 
CEV  operational  capability,  and  by  the  exploration  emphasis  on  increased  oper-
ational efficiency. Although there remain uncertainties with respect to specific plans 
for implementation of the exploration Vision, we are continuing to assess options for 
the  future  to  ensure  a  seamless  transition  for  our  employees  while  meeting  the 
needs of our NASA customer. 

Following  President  Bush’s  announcement  of  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration, 
NASA, USA and other aerospace industries began an early initiative to identify and 
prioritize  solutions  to  address  both  fly-out  and  phase-out  of  the  Shuttle  program. 
The Integrated Space Operations Summit (ISOS) was held earlier this year to iden-
tify  the  issues  associated  with  transition  planning  for  workforce,  facilities  and  in-
dustrial base. The Summit considered the risks and challenges for the retention and 
recruitment of a critically skilled workforce as well as strategies for preservation or 
disposition  of  space  flight  assets,  which  include  real  property,  equipment,  tooling, 
and test sets. Since the Summit, NASA’s Space Shuttle Program Office has initiated 
a transition plan and formed an asset management working group. 

As reported by the Government Accountability Office (GAO) in its March 2005 Re-
port  entitled,  ‘‘Space  Shuttle:  Actions  Needed  to  Better  Position  NASA  to  Sustain 
Its Workforce through Retirement,’’ p.12:

‘‘United  Space  Alliance  has  taken  preliminary  steps  to  begin  to  prepare  for  the 
Space  Shuttle’s  retirement  and  its  impact  on  the  company’s  workforce.  For  ex-
ample,  the  company  has  begun  to  define  its  critical  skills  needs  to  continue  to 
support  the  Space  Shuttle  program;  has  devised  a  communication  plan;  con-
tracted with a human capital consulting firm to conduct a comprehensive study 
of  its  workforce;  and  continues  to  monitor  indicators  of  employee  morale  and 
workforce stability. While these efforts are underway, further efforts to prepare 
for the Space Shuttle’s retirement and its impact on their workforce are on hold 
until  NASA  first  makes  decisions  that  impact  the  Space  Shuttle’s  remaining 
flight  schedule  and  thus  the  time  frames  for  retiring  the  program  and 
transitioning its assets. Once these decisions have been made and United Space 
Alliance’s contract requirements have been defined, these officials said that they 
would  then  be  able  to  proceed  with  their  workforce  planning  efforts  for  the 
Space  Shuttle’s  retirement,  a  process  that  will  likely  take  6  months  to  com-
plete.’’

United  Space  Alliance  has  retained  Watson  Wyatt’s  Human  Capital  Practice  to 
benchmark  industry’s  effective  employee  retention  programs  and  to  conduct  a  com-
prehensive  study  of  USA’s  human  resource  programs  as  they  relate  to  current  and 
anticipated workforce retention objectives. This study is focused on the current situ-
ation,  as  well  as  projections  out  6  years,  regarding  human  capital  investments  and 
risk  mitigation,  including,  alignment,  resources,  turnover,  selection,  retention, 
transfer-of-knowledge  and  investments.  The  results  of  this  study  will  be  available 
this  year,  thus  allowing  implementation,  as  appropriate,  well  in  advance  of  2010. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

USA  may  have  the  ability  to  transfer  valued  workers  into  its  owner  companies, 
Boeing and Lockheed Martin. USA has been successful in the past, placing employ-
ees  at  those  companies  and  in  assisting  employees  in  transitioning  to  other  space-
related businesses. 

USA’s  human  capital  systems  are  monitored  continuously  with  special  emphasis 
on  critical  skills  required  and  addressing  identified  gaps  in  these  skills  as  a  result 
of  attrition  and  retirements.  These  processes  will  continue  with  heightened  empha-
sis throughout the remainder of the Shuttle Program. 

USA  will  also  continue  to  conduct  annual  compensation  and  benefit  surveys  and 
studies that address our labor market competitiveness and will continue to monitor 
indicators of potential issues regarding workforce morale and stability. 

The  execution  and  timing  of  skill  retention  and  transition  measures  will  depend 
entirely  on  the  timing,  sequence,  and  options  chosen  for  transitioning  from  Shuttle 
to  future  exploration  programs.  Until  we  know  more  about  these  variables,  it  will 
be  difficult  to  predict  specific  impacts.  For  instance,  if  NASA  decides  to  pursue  a 
launch  vehicle  based  on  current  Shuttle  components,  then  the  impacts  would  be 
quite different from those of a vehicle program that does not involve Shuttle compo-
nents. 

USA  is  actively  evaluating  and  pursuing  new  business  opportunities  in  space  op-
erations, such as CEV, that could utilize the unique skills and experience of the cur-
rent  Shuttle  workforce.  USA  is  also  participating  on  the  industry  team  evaluating 
ways  to  meet  future  launch  system  requirements  with  Shuttle  Derived  Launch  Ve-
hicle options. 

Our Business Development Office is working to position USA to participate in all 
future human space flight operations. With unrivaled capabilities in terms of safety, 
experience,  performance  and  innovation,  combined  with  a  diversity  of  skills,  USA 
is uniquely positioned to play a major role in future human space programs. 
Industrial Base 

NASA’s  Space  Shuttle  budget  pays  for  hardware,  engineering,  training,  software 
development, Shuttle processing and many other things that go into flying the Shut-
tle. As the program winds down, there are elements that could phase-out of produc-
tion,  such  as,  the  External  Tank,  Space  Shuttle  Main  Engines,  and  Reusable  Solid 
Rocket  Motors.  However,  all  of  these  major  Shuttle  system  elements,  which  are 
managed by other NASA prime contractors, may be needed if Shuttle Derived Vehi-
cles are selected for the exploration transportation system. 

Retaining  critical  supplies  for  the  Shuttle  must  be  a  well  thought  out,  carefully 
managed process. One approach is to use lifetime buys for consumable products that 
will  last  to  the  end  of  the  program.  However,  there  are  some  supplies  that  cannot 
be purchased in lifetime buys and cannot be transitioned to other suppliers. In those 
cases,  it  will  require  keeping  a  supplier  on  contract  until  the  end  of  the  program 
to  support  refurbishment  requirements,  provide  on-going  technical  support,  and  re-
tain  process  certification.  NASA  and  USA  already  have  many  such  contracts  in 
place.  An  example  is  the  Lockheed  Martin  contract  for  tooling  and  certified  techni-
cian  maintenance  to  refurbish  and  manufacture  the  Reinforced  Carbon-Carbon 
(RCC) Wing Leading Edge. It is not likely that we will need additional RCC compo-
nents  however,  we  will  require  continuing  support  in  the  areas  of  testing  and  eval-
uation  of  flown  hardware,  failure  analysis,  and  repair.  A  similar  situation  exists 
with United Technologies Corporation, which provides the Shuttle fuel cells. Mainte-
nance  of  critical  skills  to  support  this  hardware  component  through  the  last  flight 
is critical. 

Many  of  the  skills  and  certifications  needed  to  support  the  Shuttle  Program  are 
unique  to  the  program.  It  is  difficult  to  estimate  the  cost  or  schedule  impact  to  the 
Shuttle or to the CEV should those skills begin to deplete. We continue to be a very 
small part of many of our suppliers’ business bases so, for some, there is little incen-
tive  to  invest  in  or  maintain  these  skills.  As  we  move  closer  to  the  last  Shuttle 
flights  and  the  corresponding  reduction  in  hardware  procurement,  this  base  could 
become more fragile. 
Manifest 

fest. 

You  have  asked  that  I  also  address  current  Space  Shuttle  operations  and  mani-

NASA  and  its  industry  team  have  embarked  on  a  proactive  Return  To  Flight 
Plan,  which  not  only  responds  to  the  CAIB  recommendations,  but  also  ‘‘raises  the 
bar’’  by  addressing  other  safety  concerns.  The  Columbia  Accident  Investigation 
Board  initially  published  15  recommendations  for  various  improvements  to  be  com-
pleted before Space Shuttle Missions could resume. Of the original 15, 12 have been 
completed and 3 are in the process of being completed. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

NASA  and  its  industry  team  have  made  improvements  in  technical  excellence, 
communications and decision-making, improved the External Tank to reduce debris-
shedding,  instrumented  the  Shuttle  wings  to  detect  any  debris  hits  during  ascent 
and amassed an array of ground-based and space-based imagery detection hardware 
that  will  give  experts  the  ability  to  know  if  any  debris  hit  the  orbiter.  If  so,  NASA 
is  developing  in-flight  repair  techniques  and  we  have  procedures  to  safely  protect 
the crew onboard the Space Station if necessary. 

NASA  and  its  contractor  team  are  committed  to  flying  the  Shuttle  only  when  all 
the risks have been appropriately mitigated. We are working with NASA to support 
the  initial  Return  To  Flight  mission,  STS–114,  which  is  currently  planned  for  the 
July 13–31 launch window. 

At present, 28 Shuttle flights are baselined in the manifest-18 for assembly, 5 for 
utilization  and  5  for  logistical  support.  Relative  to  returning  to  flight,  the  first  two 
flights,  STS–114  and  STS–121,  carry  much  needed  cargo  to  the  Space  Station  and 
importantly serve as test flights of the improved Shuttle system. Testing will be con-
ducted using the Orbiter Boom Sensor System (OBSS) to closely examine the Shut-
tle’s Thermal Protection System and to assess on-orbit repair options and techniques 
for tile and the RCC. The remaining 26 Shuttle missions are manifested as Station 
assembly and outfitting flights. 

The International Space Station (ISS) is currently dependent on the Space Shuttle 
for  assembly.  We  are  still  planning  to  fly  the  28  flights  manifested  including  the 
18  identified  as  assembly  flights  but  as  the  new  NASA  Administrator  testified, 
NASA  is  currently  examining  alternative  configurations  for  the  Space  Station.  If 
changes to the manifest are made, we will work with our NASA customer to evalu-
ate the impact to the overall program, our workforce and the supplier base. 
Operations 

United  Space  Alliance  is  the  leading  human  space  flight  space  operations  com-
pany in the world with experience in all aspects of ground processing, mission oper-
ations and planning, major system integration, and in-flight operations of multipur-
pose  space  systems.  Through  its  support  of  the  Space  Shuttle  and  ISS  programs, 
USA has developed an unrivaled combination of experience and capabilities in space 
operations. Our workforce and our supplier base have the spectrum of skills to sup-
port NASA’s current and future human space flight programs including:

• Mission, manifest and trajectory planning and analyses
• On-Orbit assembly, payload deployment and servicing
• Extravehicular activity planning and execution
• Rendezvous and proximity, operations and docking operations
• Space logistics and supply chain management
• Space operations software engineering
• Advanced space flight technology
• Launch and recovery operations
• Launch vehicle and flight hardware processing
• Mission control operations
• Space systems and crew training
• Sustaining engineering
• Flight crew equipment preparation and maintenance.
• Large scale, complex systems integration
• Subcontracts management

Conclusion 

United Space Alliance is committed to returning the Shuttle to flight and to sup-
porting  a  seamless  transition  from  the  current  program  to  future  exploration  pro-
grams.  Workforce  morale  is  high  as  the  first  step  in  the  Vision  draws  near:  the 
launch  of  Space  Shuttle  Discovery  mission  STS–114.  We  are  committed  to  sup-
porting  NASA  in  our  joint  goal  of  making  each  flight  safer  for  the  crew  than  we 
believed that last one to have been. 

We also support NASA’s goal to undertake a journey of space exploration over the 
next several decades as outlined in the President’s Vision for Space Exploration. We 
understand  that  the  retirement  of  3  capable  and  space-worthy  Space  Shuttle  orbit-
ers is needed in order to move the Vision forward. Our exceptional workforce is com-
mitted  to  these  goals  and  deserves  our  utmost  consideration  in  the  transition  to  a 
new system for space exploration. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Let  me  again  thank  the  Subcommittee  for  the  opportunity  to  come  before  you 

today. I would be pleased to answer your questions.

18

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  appreciate  the  very  difficult  job  you  are 
going to have in the, well, next 5 years to 2010 to maintain all the 
capabilities  and  yet  knowing  what  a  final  date  is,  when  that  final 
date is set. Thank you very much. 

Dr.  Joan  Johnson-Freese  is  the  Chairman  of  the  Department  of 

National Security Studies at the Naval War College. 

Dr. Freese, welcome. 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JOAN  JOHNSON–FREESE,  CHAIRMAN,
DEPARTMENT  OF  NATIONAL  SECURITY  STUDIES,  NAVAL 
WAR COLLEGE 
Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Hutchison,  Senator 
Nelson.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  speak  with  you  today  on  the 
critical  issue  of  the  future  of  manned  space  flight,  specifically  the 
strategic  environment  of  human  space  flight.  I  have  worked  on 
space policy issues for more than 20 years from many perspectives. 
And based on that experience, I feel that human space flight is not 
just  something  the  United  States  should  remain  actively  engaged 
in; it is an area strategically it must retain leadership in. 

In  May  2003,  there  was  a  newspaper  op-ed  piece  entitled,  ‘‘Next 
Huge  Space  Shot,  China.’’  It  began  with  the  sentence,  ‘‘Once  upon 
a  time,  we  ruled  the  universe.  Now  we’re  second-raters  in  space.’’ 
It  concluded  with  the  sentence,  ‘‘We  have  forfeited  the  last  fron-
tier.’’ Convoluted interpretations of events and leaps of reasonings, 
like  those  expressed  in  that  piece,  unfortunately  are  not  uncom-
mon. 

Consequently,  it  is  not  really  surprising  that  many  people  have 
concluded  that  with  one  21-hour  manned  space  flight,  China  has 
catapulted ahead of the United States in overall space capabilities, 
especially  human  space  flight  capabilities.  While  it  is  sadly  true 
that the U.S. has not chosen to pursue human space exploration in 
a timely and concerted manner, as many people hoped it would, we 
are certainly by no means a second-rate space power because it has 
pursued  a  different  priority  and  slower  pace.  But  there  is  percep-
tion. 

Human  space  flight,  human  space  activity  has  always  had  a 
strong  symbolic  significance.  Because  of  the  early  and  spectacular 
U.S.  successes  in  the  manned  space  flight  arena,  winning  the  race 
to  the  Moon,  the  U.S.  has  heretofore  been  considered  the  unchal-
lenged  leader  in  human  space  activity.  Unfortunately,  again,  that 
perception has been slipping. 

Now  with  the  Chinese  willing  to  play  the  tortoise  to  the  U.S. 
hare, there is a very real chance that the U.S. will be outpaced by 
commitment  demonstrated  by  consistency  rather  than  speed  or 
substance,  creating  the  perception  that  the  U.S.  is  forfeiting  its 
leadership.  There  are  many  reasons  this  should  not  be  allowed  to 
happen. And I would be happy to go into them with you. 

But  as  the  sole  super  power,  the  U.S.  must  lead  the  way  to  the 
future.  How  we  lead  the  way  is  critical  as  well  and  I  think  offers 
the  United  States  an  opportunity  to  demonstrate  inclusive  leader-
ship toward generating soft power critical to advance U.S. policies. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

The  U.S.  cinched  leadership  in  human  space  flight  early  on.  Now 
the strategic imperative is to maintain it. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Johnson-Freese follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JOAN JOHNSON-FREESE, CHAIRMAN, DEPARTMENT OF 

NATIONAL SECURITY STUDIES, NAVAL WAR COLLEGE 

Last  week,  I  challenged  my  class  of  78  college  students  to,  first,  name  three  of 
the Apollo astronauts, then, three current astronauts. Some could name three Apollo 
astronauts, none could name three current astronauts, or even one. The Apollo pro-
gram  represents  a  glorious  part  of  American  history.  Neil  Armstrong  stepping  off 
planet Earth and onto another celestial body was both a shining moment for Ameri-
cans, and a spiritual moment for all mankind. America held the attention and admi-
ration  of  the  world  because  it  dared  to  venture  into  the  Heavens.  But  too  often 
America  is  a  crisis-response  society.  Politically  motivated  to  go  to  the  Moon  by  the 
Soviet  launch  of  Sputnik,  in  less  than  a  decade  the  United  States  was  successful 
beyond  anyone’s  wildest  imagination.  Unfortunately,  however,  we  did  not  choose  to 
stay  or  to  continue  the  journey.  Instead,  we  came  home  and  spaceflight  has  since 
been  confined  to  the  celestial  driveway.  Now,  except  for  a  few  die-hards,  the  Amer-
ican  public  shows  more  interest  in  its  space  museums  than  space  exploration.  But, 
I  will  suggest,  allowing  even  the  perception  of  U.S.  leadership  in  human  space  to 
slip has negative strategic implications for the United States. 

Americans take great pride in space achievements. Even at the height of the Apol-
lo era though, opinion polls showed that the public sees space exploration as a good 
thing  to  do,  but  expendable  when  prioritized  against  other  demands  for  federal 
funding,  like  health  care,  education,  schools  and  defense.  Subsequently,  the  human 
space program has been struggling since Apollo to find a raison d’etre with both the 
public and politicians sufficient to carry human spaceflight out of the celestial drive-
way  and  into  the  street.  The  difference  between  Apollo  and  all  subsequent  human 
space  visions  has  been  the  goals.  Whereas  Apollo  had  a  strategic  goal—‘‘beat  the 
Russians’’—programs since have had science and exploration as their goals and un-
fortunately,  these  goals  have  not  proven  sufficient  to  be  competitive  with  other  de-
mands for federal funds. 

While  many  countries  have  shown  interest  over  the  years  in  developing  autono-
mous  human  space  programs,  besides  the  United  States  only  Russia  and  China,  as 
of the October 2003 launch of the first Chinese taikonaut, have been successful. The 
Russian  human  space  program  was  rescued  from  becoming  moribund  when  it 
merged  with  NASA’s  human  program  to  develop  the  International  Space  Station 
(ISS). Russia is still, however, unable to pursue new high-cost initiatives on its own, 
due to both economics and because they have learned that developing and maintain-
ing support for a human space program is hard in democracies. While the European 
Space  Agency  (ESA)  and  countries  like  Japan  and  India  likely  have  the  technical 
wherewithal to have a successful human space program, they lack the requisite po-
litical will. In a Catch-22 scenario, however, having to always play a supporting role 
to the United States makes it even more difficult to garner public support and polit-
ical  will  for  human  space  activity.  While  Japan  has  long  talked  about  a  human 
space  program,  being  responsible  to  an  electorate,  bureaucratic  politics,  economics 
and  a  cultural  adversity  to  risk  will  likely  keep  them  Earthbound.  India  too,  as  a 
democracy,  remains  constrained  by  public  perceptions  of  priorities  lying  elsewhere. 
It  is  only  because  China’s  program  is  driven  from  the  top  that  it  has  successfully 
been carried to fruition. So why is China, a country with 1.3 billion+ people, willing 
to devote significant resources to human spaceflight capability? 

The  Apollo  program  demonstrated  the  benefits  that  accrue  to  a  nation  able  to 
claim  a  human  spaceflight  capability.  In  the  movie  Apollo  13  Tom  Hanks  shows  a 
Congressional  delegation  around  Kennedy  Space  Center  pointing  out  constituent 
jobs  in  high  tech  fields  that  were  politically  distributed  to  all  fifty  states.  Jobs  are 
always a valued program benefit. Americans expressed interest in science and tech-
nology  education  unmatched  either  before  or  after  Apollo.  Technology  developed  for 
space translated into economic development. Dual-use technology with both civil and 
military  applications  was  developed.  And  finally,  America  enjoyed  the  prestige  of 
‘‘winning’’ the space race against the Soviet Union, which translated into a unifying 
pride during the contentious Vietnam War era, and also drew Third World countries 
to our side during the Cold War when East-West blocks competed for support. 

Those  same  benefits,  jobs,  education,  economic  development,  dual-use  technology 
and prestige are still motivating factors for space activity. Since the 1950’s, Europe 
has pursued space under the premise that space activity generated technology, tech-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

nology  generated  industry,  and  industry  led  to  economic  development.  China 
learned from the Apollo playbook as well. Training and employing workers in high-
technology  aerospace  jobs  in  China  keeps  large  numbers  of  people  employed,  which 
is  a  Chinese  priority.  It  also  demonstrates  to  the  world  that  China  is  able  to,  as 
one Chinese commentator put it, ‘‘make more than shoes,’’ thereby supporting their 
overarching  economic  development  goal  by  attracting  global  industries  to  China. 
China  is  also  experiencing  growth  in  science  and  engineering  education  programs 
at unprecedented levels. China is clearly interested in modernizing its military, and, 
again learning from the U.S. playbook, China has seen the benefits space can yield 
in  force  enhancement  capabilities.  And  finally,  there  is  prestige.  Prestige  takes  on 
two  dimensions  for  China:  first,  domestically  it  bestows  credibility  on  the  Com-
munist  government  much  in  the  same  way  bringing  the  Olympics  to  Beijing  does. 
In  regional  and  international  terms,  prestige  translates  into  techno-nationalism, 
where perceived technical prowess is equated to regional power. This is particularly 
important  to  China,  which  has  been  working  hard  and  been  largely  successful  at 
using  economics  and  soft  power  to  transform  its  regional  image  from  that  of  the 
bully, to a rising power that countries can work with. For countries like Japan and 
India, these perceptions are important. 

Speculation about an Asian space race floats on the wind, but it is unlikely. After 
the  Shenzhou  V  launch  in  October  2003,  the  Indian  science  community  claimed  it 
too  could  have  accomplished  such  an  achievement,  but  had  simply  chosen  not  to. 
That response was intended to quell concerns from both the Indian public and politi-
cians  about  China’s  technical  prowess  compared  to  India’s  techno-nationalism.  Ini-
tial  Japanese  responses  to  the  launch  varied.  Space  officials  downplayed  the  tech-
nical significance of the event, while nonetheless congratulating China. A Japanese 
official  spoke  to  the  media  directly  in  geostrategic  terms.  ‘‘Japan  is  likely  to  be  the 
one to take the severest blow from the Chinese success. A country capable of launch-
ing any time will have a large influence in terms of diplomacy at the United Nations 
and  military  affairs.  Moves  to  buy  products  from  a  country  succeeding  in  human 
space  flight  may  occur.’’ 1 One  woman  on  the  street  was  quoted  in  Japanese  media 
coverage as saying, ‘‘It’s unbelievable. Japan lost in this field.’’ 2 While Japan’s ‘‘los-
ing’’  to  China  through  the  Shenzhou  V  launch  was  more  perception  than  reality, 
China’s  success  juxtaposed  against  power  failures  on  both  the  Japanese  environ-
mental satellite Midori-2 and on its first Mars probe, Nozomi, as well as the Novem-
ber  2003  launch  failure  of  two  Information  Gathering  Satellites  (IGS),  resulted  in 
calls  for  a  re-examination  of  the  Japanese  program.  However,  because  of  the  prob-
lems  initiating  and  sustaining  human  space  programs  in  democracies,  combined 
with  unique  internal  politics  in  both  countries,  the  initiation  of  an  autonomous 
human program in either Japan or India is unlikely. 

With  China’s  entry  into  the  exclusive  human  spaceflight  club,  the  strategic 
gameboard  was  put  in  motion.  Whereas  the  United  States  has  pursued  a  path  of 
simultaneous cooperation and competition with other countries in various aspects of 
space,  such  as  cooperating  with  Europe  on  ISS  but  competing  in  the  commercial 
launch field, with China the U.S. approach has been purely competitive. China has 
been excluded from partnership on the International Space Station, for many years 
their ‘‘brass ring.’’ The reasoning for the U.S. purely competitive approach has been 
technical and political: seeking to stop China from acquiring sensitive dual use tech-
nology,  concern  that  China  will  be  the  next  U.S.  peer  competitor,  and  not  wanting 
to  support  the  largest  remaining  Communist  government  in  the  world,  especially 
one  charged  with  human  rights  abuses  and  other  practices  averse  to  democratic 
principles.  While  such  an  approach  may  be  virtuous,  realities  are  such  that  it  in-
creasingly appears counterproductive. 

We  have  to  face  an  uncomfortable  fact  here:  a  country  whose  interests  may  very 
well some day conflict with our own is going to pursue a line of technological devel-
opment that could enhance its ability to challenge us through multiple venues. And 
they  are  going  to  be  aided  in  this  by  other  countries,  whether  we  like  it  or  not. 
While  the  U.S.  seeks  to  contain  China,  much  of  the  rest  of  the  world  is  eager  to 
work  with  China,  thereby  negating  much  of  the  impact  the  United  States  is  trying 
to achieve, and indirectly encouraging activities not necessarily in the interest of the 
U.S.  Other  countries,  allies,  have  often  held  passive-aggressive  feelings  toward 
space  partnerships  with  the  U.S.:  welcoming  and  grateful  for  the  opportunities, 
while  resenting  being  inherently  consigned  to  a  supporting  role,  and  feeling  that 

1 ‘‘China’s  launch  of  manned  spacecraft  welcomed  in  Japan,’’  Japan  Economic  Newswire,  15 

2 ‘‘China’s  launch  of  manned  spacecraft  welcomed  in  Japan,’’  Japan  Economic  Newswire,  15 

October 2003. 

October 2003. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

U.S.  partners  are  often  treated  more  as  secondary  participants  or  sub-contractors 
on projects. Working with China gives them a chance to level the playing field. 

There  is  a  fairly  widespread  perception  among  the  U.S.  and  international  media, 
and  a  disconcerting  number  of  the  American  public,  that  a  human  space  race  be-
tween  China  and  the  U.S.  is  either  already  underway  or  inevitable.  China’s  one 
human  launch  into  space  clearly  demonstrated  the  maturity  of  Chinese  space  engi-
neering. Successfully launching a rocket is not, however, a scientific breakthrough—
the  know-how  has  been  in  textbooks  for  more  than  fifty  years.  It  does  demonstrate 
the careful attention to literally thousands of minute engineering details. But by no 
means has China leapfrogged over U.S. capabilities. 

China  has  ambitious  human  space  goals,  but  a  modest,  incremental  implementa-
tion  plan.  Officially,  their  current  human  program  is  a  three  part  plan:  man  in 
space, a space laboratory, and a space station. Beyond that, their ambitions for the 
Moon  and  Mars  are  facing  the  same  funding  and  political  hurdles  as  NASA  faces 
in  the  U.S.  In  a  November  21,  2004  press  conference  Ouyang  Ziyuan,  the  lead  sci-
entist  of  their  lunar  program,  talked  about  the  costs  and  benefits  of  space,  ref-
erencing the Apollo experience. 3 

‘‘The  lunar  exploration  project  will  spur  high  tech  development,  and  I  cannot 
calculate  how  much  return  there  will  be  on  that  investment  of  1.4  billion,  but 
the  Apollo  project  spurred  the  scientific,  technical,  economic  military  and  other 
development  of  the  1960s,  produced  over  3,000  new  technologies  of  all  types 
with applications useful in everyday life, and was not only responsible for Amer-
ica’s leading position in science and technology, but it produced enormous polit-
ical and economic change.
It  is  estimated  that  for  every  dollar  invested  there  was  an  economic  return  of 
4–5  dollars.  We  learned  a  lot  about  the  Moon,  the  Earth,  and  the  Sun  that  is 
impossible to calculate in dollar terms. From ancient times to the present China 
has had the legend of Chang E, and you could say that going to the Moon start-
ed  with  China,  but  to  today  we  have  still  not  left  the  Earth.  The  lunar  explo-
ration  project  will  have  an  incalculably  valuable  effect  on  the  ethnic  spirit  and 
motivation (of the Chinese people) and I ask you, how much is that worth?’’

While  having  to  justify  expenditures,  the  Chinese  will  continue  their  quest  for 
space  as  long  as  sufficient  domestic  and  geostrategic  benefits  accrue,  and  they  will 
solicit international partners. 

China’s human spaceflight program was largely indigenously developed, but based 
on  proven  designs  adapted  to  make  them  their  own.  They  have  openly  stated  their 
appreciation  for  the  work  of  the  former  Soviet  Union  toward  making  their  own 
human  spaceflight  program  a  success.  China  understands  the  benefits,  fiscal,  tech-
nical  and  political,  of  cooperation.  In  the  same  November  21,  2004  press  report, 
Ouyang Ziyuan spoke about cooperation. ‘‘International cooperation (in space explo-
ration)  is  a  necessary  development,  no  single  country  has  the  ability  to  complete 
(this  undertaking)  by  itself.  Landing  on  the  Moon  is  an  affair  of  the  entire  human 
race, and we should make our contribution on behalf of the Chinese race, fulfill the 
responsibility of the Chinese race. We want to learn together with others, not close 
ourselves  off  and  go  our  own  way.’’  A  pragmatic  move  for  the  Chinese,  there  were 
interested takers to invitations for cooperation. 

China  has  spent  approximately  $2.2  billion  on  its  Shenzhou  program,  whereas 
NASA’s annual budget is in excess of $16 billion. Shenzhou V was launched in 2003; 
Shenzhou  VI  will  likely  be  launched  in  2005.  From  the  Chinese  perspective,  there 
was no need to go any sooner, as China has been able to enjoy its new found status 
as the third country capable of human spaceflight, while improving its technical ca-
pabilities, and keeping spending to a manageable level. Nevertheless, China’s ability 
to  successfully  launch  their  first  taikonaut  while  the  U.S.  Space  Shuttle  was 
grounded added to the perception of China’s technical prowess compared to the U.S., 
not an inconsequential or unrewarding benefit for the Chinese. If the Shuttle is still 
not  flying  next  Fall  when  the  Chinese  launch  again,  the  Chinese  will  reap  further 
prestige and publicity at the expense of the U.S. The U.S. has historically been the 
reigning  human  space  champion,  but  there  is  always  interest—and  even  tacit  sup-
port—when  a  spoiler  overtakes,  or  even  appears  to  overtake,  a  champion.  The  U.S. 
appears in, and to some losing, a human space race, because the U.S. has been un-
able to set and implement a realistic way forward, and because of U.S. political re-
luctance  to  use  cooperation,  historically  shown  successful,  to  co-opt  and  shape  the 
Chinese  space  program  as  we  have  other  programs.  The  Chinese  are  playing  Tor-
toise to the U.S. Hare. 

3 See: People’s Daily Website.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

It has been suggested that engaging China in a space race would provide the po-
litical  will  for  the  U.S.  human  program  to  move  forward,  as  the  Soviet  Union’s  ac-
tivities did for Apollo, or that it would trigger a spending spree in China with effects 
similar  to  those  experienced  by  the  Soviet  Union  trying  to  keep  up  with  SDI.  Both 
are flawed analogies. During the Cold War, two competing superpowers started from 
the same point technologically and engaged in an engineering race. Both were moti-
vated to compete. Now, the Chinese have no reason to ‘‘race’’ the United States. Chi-
nese  spending  will  not  increase  to  keep  up  or  outpace  the  United  States  either,  as 
they  fully  understand  it  is  impossible.  China  needs  only  to  incrementally  continue 
their  human  space  program  to  create  the  perception  that  it  is  ‘‘beating’’  the  United 
States. China’s activities place the U.S. in a race against itself, to maintain its lead-
ership. 

Meanwhile,  China  will  increasingly  engage  other  countries  in  cooperative  space 
activity.  Technological  containment  of  the  U.S.S.R.  took  place  in  another  time  and 
under  circumstances  that  are  now  impossible  to  replicate:  there  is  no  way  to  seal 
China  off  from  the  technologies  it  seeks.  Our  best  hope,  then,  is  to  shape  China’s 
future in space, rather than watch it develop in 20 years—with assistance from oth-
ers—into  something  that  we  will  wish  we  could  have  diverted.  China  is  already 
working with the European Space Agency on programs ranging from DoubleStar to 
Galileo, it worked with Russia on human spaceflight, and it is courting many Asian 
countries  for  projects  involving  cooperative  work  on  environmental  and  disaster 
monitoring  and  management,  sometimes  through  the  Asia-Pacific  Multilateral  Co-
operation  in  Space  Organization  (APSCO).  That  the  EU  considered  dropping  its 
arms  embargo  against  China  demonstrates  that  other  countries  do  not  necessarily 
share U.S. views about the value or necessity of isolating China. Over the long term, 
the  reality  is  that  China  will  increasingly  engage  partners  in  space  activity.  The 
question  is  whether  the  United  States  will  choose  to  deflect  or  co-opt  some  of  that 
cooperative activity in directions of our choosing? 

The  United  States  has  historically  and  successfully  employed  cooperative  space 
activities  to  ‘‘shape’’  other  countries’  programs;  guiding  them  into  benign  areas  of 
interest  and  leaving  them  less  funds  to  pursue  activities  less  in  our  interest.  Con-
trolled  or  limited  cooperation  has  also  allowed  the  U.S.  to  get  a  much  better  idea 
of  exactly  what  the  priorities  and  capabilities  are  in  other  countries.  Because  Chi-
na’s program is still largely opaque, isolating it will only limit our ability to monitor 
what  they  are  doing,  and  perhaps  even  more  important,  their  long-term  intent. 
Technology  transfer  remains  a  critical  issue.  Given  that  stopping  technology  trans-
fer  to  China  is  impossible  because  the  U.S.  does  not  have  a  technology  monopoly, 
managing  it  through  transfers  from  the  U.S.,  rather  than  having  China  obtain  it 
from  other  countries  with  lesser  controls,  becomes  a  pragmatic  option.  Further,  co-
operation  with  China  on  space  offers  the  U.S.  leverage  in  Chinese  space  activities, 
gets  the  U.S.  out  of  a  counterproductive  perception  of  a  space  race,  and  offers  the 
U.S.  the  opportunity  to  develop  soft  power  through  a  human  space  program  with 
a goal beyond science and exploration—strategic leadership. 

Cooperation in space with China does not excuse the Communist regime from its 
commitment  to  Communism  and  its  abysmal  record  on  human  rights.  But  indeed 
it is because China is an authoritarian state at the crossroads of its political devel-
opment that it becomes imperative that America, as the world’s leading democracy, 
step forward and help shape China’s aspirations in space toward peaceful and coop-
erative  ends  rather  than  see  them  turned  toward  more  threatening  ideological  or 
military  goals.  It  should  also  be  pointed  out  that  attempting  to  draw  linkages  be-
tween  space  cooperation  and  other  foreign  policy  goals,  like  human  rights,  is  un-
likely  to  be  successful.  The  U.S.  tried  with  the  Soviet  Union  and  only  became  frus-
trated. The U.S. can use space cooperation to co-opt, or shape, Chinese space activ-
ity. That is a worthy goal in itself. 

An inclusive cooperative human space program returns to the Apollo model, a pro-
gram with a strategic goal, but this time based on cooperation rather than competi-
tion.  Cooperation  is  not  easy.  But  the  ISS  experience,  and  studies  conducted  by 
groups  such  as  the  American  Institute  of  Aeronautics  and  Astronautics  with  long 
experience  in  cooperation  models  tells  us  there  are  ways  to  manage  the  issues. 4 A 
first  step  in  any  model  is  to  assure  that  all  partners  have  a  vested  interest  in  suc-
cess, all partners fully understand their roles, and that the science and engineering 
goals are meaningful. We know how to do it. 

Imagine if you will a few alternative, hypothetical scenarios. If the United States 
were  to  finish  the  ISS  only  to  then  turn  it  over  to  the  partners  so  the  U.S.  could 

4 See, for example, a recent AIAA paper by Peggy Finarelli and Ian Pryke, ‘‘Optimizing Space 
Exploration  through  International  Cooperation,’’  and  the  full  report  of  the  7th  AIAA  Workshop 
on International Space Cooperation, www.aiaa.org/IntlCoop. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

pursue the Moon/ Mars vision, but then got mired down in technical or political dif-
ficulties, which would not be hard to imagine, the U.S. could end up the only space-
faring  nation  not  involved  in  ISS.  If  the  U.S.  pursues  the  Moon/Mars  vision  with 
the ISS partners, but not China; it is China (the developing country) versus the rest 
of  the  (developed)  world,  magnifying  the  perceived  importance  of  each  small  ad-
vancement China makes and every misstep we make. If the U.S. pursues the Moon/
Mars  mission  alone—other  countries  could  see  working  with  China  as  an  oppor-
tunity  to  work  on  a  human  space  program,  and  on  a  more  level  playing  field,  cre-
ating a U.S. versus China+ scenario. And finally, some have suggested that the U.S. 
simply forego human space activity. 

The  U.S.  must  not,  however,  allow  human  space  leadership  to  slip  away.  Human 
spaceflight  requires  pushing  the  envelop  in  areas  of  science  and  engineering—in 
medical fields and areas of life support systems engineering, for example—otherwise 
potentially  neglected.  While  direct  benefits  to  the  economy  or  defense  from  a  par-
ticular program may not always be identifiable in advance, GPS, once a government 
program without a clear mission, has certainly demonstrated that we should not be 
bound by the limits of our imagination. The importance that space provides to build-
ing science capabilities generally is not unnoticed elsewhere. China, for example, is 
acutely  aware  that  it  has  a  long  way  to  go  toward  becoming  a  science  ‘‘power’’  and 
it hopes human spaceflight will accelerate its movement up the learning curve. For 
the U.S. to maintain its leadership position, it is therefore imperative that the U.S. 
stays  active  in  space  as  well.  It  is  also  important  to  remember  that  human 
spaceflight  is  part  of  the  U.S.  space  agenda,  not  the  entire  agenda.  We  need  to 
maintain  a  balance  in  the  U.S.  to  assure  continued  preeminence  in  all  aspects  of 
science  and  engineering.  And  finally,  space  represents  the  future.  It  is  imperative 
that the United States, as the world’s leader, remain the world’s leader into the fu-
ture. 

Finally, I encourage this Committee to look into and plan for the future of human 
spaceflight from an ‘‘effects-based’’ perspective. What does the U.S. hope to achieve? 
Is the U.S. looking to maintain its preeminence in human spaceflight? I suggest we 
must. If that is the goal, realistically, we need a rationale beyond science and explo-
ration to sustain the momentum. Competition once served that purpose but will not 
any  longer.  Indeed  competition  places  the  U.S.  into  a  race  not  in  its  best  interests. 
Strategic  leadership  of  a  cooperative  space  mission  off  planet  Earth  offers  the  U.S. 
a  viable  way  forward  toward  maintaining  U.S.  leadership  while  generating  signifi-
cant  soft  power  globally,  soft  power  necessary  toward  such  strategic  goals  as  effec-
tively  fighting  the  Global  War  on  Terrorism.  I  encourage  this  Committee  to  look  at 
space from a strategic perspective, not just from a science or exploration perspective.

Senator HUTCHISON. Dr. Scott Horowitz, Director of Space Trans-

portation and Exploration at ATK Thiokol. 

STATEMENT OF DR. SCOTT J. HOROWITZ, DIRECTOR, SPACE 
TRANSPORTATION AND EXPLORATION, ATK THIOKOL, INC. 
Dr.  HOROWITZ.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chair  and  Senator  Nelson. 
It  is  a  great  honor  to  be  here  today.  And  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity  to  discuss  evolving  Space  Shuttle  systems  that  will  provide 
a safe, reliable, and a cost-effective method to ensure human access 
to  space,  along  with  heavy  lift  we  are  going  to  need  to  have  to  do 
space exploration and retire the Space Shuttle by 2010. 

It  has  been  a  great  privilege  and  an  honor  to  have  served  as  an 
astronaut  on  four  Space  Shuttle  missions.  So  I  have  seen  ren-
dezvous  in  space,  the  International  Space  Station,  and  the  Hubble 
Telescope  up  close  and  personal.  And  we  at  ATK  are  very  excited 
about  the  President’s  vision  and  support  NASA’s  new  adminis-
trator, Mike Griffin, in his efforts to make this vision a reality. 

I  firmly  believe  that  we  can  safely  and  affordably  transition  the 
Space  Shuttle  program  to  support  exploration  by  leveraging  our 
flight-proven  and  human-rated  elements  that  exist  today.  NASA 
needs a safe, reliable, and affordable method of transporting crews 
to and from Earth orbit and heavy lift for cargo. That is the bottom 
line. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

And I believe it is tremendously important to learn lessons from 
the  past  and  apply  them  to  the  future  of  human  space  flight.  The 
Columbia Accident Investigation Board had concluded, and I quote, 
‘‘The  design  of  the  system  should  give  overriding  priority  to  crew 
safety, rather than trade safety against other performance criteria, 
such as low cost and reusability.’’ And I totally agree with this con-
clusion. 

So  there  are  two  things  we  have  to  address,  which  is  heavy  lift 
and crew transport. Albert Einstein once said, ‘‘Make everything as 
simple  as  possible,  but  not  any  simpler.’’  So  we  have  concepts  for 
a  simple,  safe  way  evolving,  for  example,  using  the  solid  rocket 
booster and maybe a J–2S from the Apollo program or another en-
gine to safely get the crew to and from orbit. In fact, a recent study 
has shown that this particular launch vehicle has a forecasted crew 
safety  level  of  more  than  an  order  of  magnitude  safer  than  today’s 
Shuttle. 

We also have tremendous capabilities that we can utilize to sup-
port our exploration vision. The propulsion system, for example, as 
has  been  said  before,  already  today  propels  240,000  pounds  to  low 
Earth orbit. That is over 100 metric tons. So we have a tremendous 
capability today. One of the things that I do as I travel around the 
country  sharing  the  adventures  of  flying  in  space,  is  I  point  out 
that  it  is  not  the  thrust  of  the  solid  rocket  motors  and  the  Space 
Shuttle  main  engines  that  propel  us  to  space,  but  it  is  the  dedica-
tion,  hard  work,  hopes  and  dreams  of  the  many  skilled  and  tal-
ented people that develop, manufacture, and prepare these systems 
that carry us to orbit. 

Transitioning this workforce to support exploration is going to be 
key  to  our  success.  In  summary,  we  do  have  a  safe  and  a  simple 
solution  that  we  can  have  soon.  We  owe  it  to  our  children  and  fu-
ture generations to do so. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  this  opportunity.  And  I  would  be 

pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Yes. Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Horowitz follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. SCOTT J. HOROWITZ, DIRECTOR, SPACE 

TRANSPORTATION AND EXPLORATION, ATK THIOKOL, INC. 

Madame  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  invitation 
to  appear  before  you.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  discuss  evolving  the  Space 
Shuttle systems, and in particular leveraging the hardware, infrastructure and peo-
ple to minimize development schedules and to provide a safe, reliable, cost effective 
method to insure human access to space along with heavy lift for exploration when 
we retire the Space Shuttle in 2010. 

I  have  had  the  honor  and  privilege  to  serve  our  country  as  an  Air  Force  F–15 
fighter  pilot,  test  pilot,  and  NASA  astronaut  on  four  Space  Shuttle  missions  as  a 
pilot  and  commander  including  a  microgravity/science  mission,  Hubble  servicing 
mission,  and  two  missions  to  the  International  Space  Station.  Upon  retiring  from 
NASA  and  the  Air  Force  I  joined  the  ATK  Thiokol  team  as  the  Director  of  Space 
Transportation  and  Exploration.  These  experiences,  coupled  with  a  Ph.D.  in  Aero-
space  Engineering  from  Georgia  Tech,  have  provided  me  with  a  unique  perspective 
on  what  it  takes  for  our  team  to  conduct  successful  human  space  flight  missions. 
We  at  ATK  are  excited  about  the  President’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  and 
fully  support  NASA’s  new  administrator,  Mike  Griffin,  in  his  efforts  to  make  this 
vision  a  reality.  I  firmly  believe  that  we  can  safely  and  affordably  transition  the 
Space Shuttle program to support the Exploration program by leveraging the flight-
proven  and  human-rated  elements  that  exists  today.  This  will  enable  us  to  retire 
the orbiter, and eliminate any gap in U.S. Human Space Flight capability. If we can 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

start soon, we can fully meet the demanding needs of heavy lift and crew transpor-
tation  more  safely,  more  reliably,  and  more  affordably  than  with  any  other  option 
by the end of the decade. 

NASA’s  need  for  a  safe,  reliable,  affordable  method  of  transporting  crews  to  and 
from  Low  Earth  Orbit  can  be  achieved  as  we  move  forward  with  exploration.  But 
I believe it tremendously important to learn from the lessons of the past and apply 
them  to  the  future  of  human  space  flight.  The  Columbia  Accident  Investigation 
Board  concluded  that  ‘‘The  design  of  the  system  should  give  overriding  priority  to 
crew safety, rather than trade safety against other performance criteria, such as low 
cost and reusability, or against advanced space operation capability other than crew 
transfer.’’  I  totally  agree  with  this  conclusion.  Additionally,  in  a  memo  dated  May 
4, 2004, the NASA astronaut office offered their consensus on the future by stating: 
‘‘Although  flying  in  space  will  always  involve  some  measure  of  risk,  it  is  our  con-
sensus that an order-of-magnitude reduction in the risk of loss of human life during 
ascent, is both achievable with current technology and consistent with NASA’s focus 
on  steadily  improving  reliability’’  (Attachment  1:  Astronaut  Office  Position  on  Fu-
ture Launch System Safety, Memo, CB–04–044, May 4, 2004). 

The first step is to realize the tremendous capabilities that already exist and that 
can  be  utilized  in  the  future  to  support  our  nations  exploration  vision.  The  Space 
Shuttle  propulsion  systems  are  the  most  reliable  systems  in  the  world.  The  Reus-
able  Solid  Rocket  Motors  used  in  the  Space  Shuttle  launch  phase  have  flown  226 
times  with  significant  engineering,  inspection,  and  testing  supporting  well  under-
stood  operational  margins;  the  Space  Shuttle  Main  Engines  have  flown  339  times 
and  have  over  a  million  seconds  of  testing!  These  reliable  and  proven  propulsion 
systems  coupled  with  the  External  Tank  constitute  the  Space  Shuttle  ‘‘propulsive 
backbone’’  and  provide  us  an  impressive  capability  to  lift  large  payloads  to  Low 
Earth  Orbit.  Every  time  we  launch  a  Space  Shuttle  we  send  about  240,000  pounds 
(over 100 Metric Tons) to Low Earth Orbit! More importantly, we have the existing 
infrastructure  and  skills  today  to  produce,  launch,  and  operate  this  amazing  hard-
ware.  As  I  travel  around  the  country  sharing  the  adventure  of  flying  in  space,  I 
point out that it isn’t the thrust of the Solid Rocket Motors and Space Shuttle Main 
Engines  that  propel  us  to  space,  but  the  dedication,  hard  work,  hopes  and  dreams 
of  the  many  skilled  and  talented  people  that  develop,  manufacture,  and  prepare 
these systems that carry us to orbit. Transitioning this workforce to support Explo-
ration is key to our success. 

By evolving the shuttle’s propulsive backbone to provide a heavy lift launch capa-
bility  we  can  engage  this  talented,  skilled  workforce,  and  utilize  our  existing  infra-
structure. Because the orbiter vehicle sustaining, launch processing, and associated 
logistics drive the cost of the existing shuttle program, removing the orbiter will re-
sult in a significant reduction in cost. The propulsion elements of the Space Shuttle 
program  only  make  up  a  fraction  of  the  overall  costs,  making  utilization  of  these 
systems extremely attractive for cost, safety, reliability, and sustainability. Not only 
is  this  launch  system  very  affordable,  it  is  the  lowest  cost  in  terms  of  dollars  per 
pound to low earth orbit. 

Two  primary  options  are  being  reviewed  to  provide  heavy  lift  (greater  than 
150,000  pounds)—The  first  option  replaces  the  orbiter  vehicle  with  a  side-mounted 
expendable  cargo  carrier  utilizing  the  propulsion  backbone  and  the  same  connec-
tions as the orbiter. This approach minimizes configuration changes while providing 
the  capability  to  launch  170,000  to  200,000  lbs  to  LEO.  A  second  option,  providing 
capability up to 250,000 lbs to LEO, is to remove the orbiter, move the main engines 
below the External Tank, and add an optional second stage and cargo carrier to the 
top of the external tank. The modifications required for option 2 are more extensive 
than  option  1  but  option  2  has  the  added  advantage  of  being  able  to  provide  larger 
and heavier payloads to Low Earth Orbit. 

Heavy  lift  capability  in  the  ranges  that  I  have  mentioned  is  significant  in  that 
it  offers  the  lowest  risk  and  highest  mission  reliability,  and  ultimately  the  lowest 
cost  for  exploration  missions.  It  would  take  5  to  7  launches  using  smaller  existing 
launch  vehicles  to  accomplish  what  a  single  170,000  to  250,000  pound  launch  vehi-
cle can do. 

The cost of breaking the exploration missions into numerous smaller pieces to ac-
commodate  a  smaller  launch  vehicle  is  cost  prohibitive.  Each  smaller  element  will 
have  to  become  a  complete  spacecraft  on  orbit  while  performing  an  automated  ren-
dezvous and docking and be burdened with all the systems required to survive and 
operate  in  space  including  power  systems,  thermal  control  systems,  propulsion  sys-
tems,  guidance  navigation  and  control  systems,  docking  systems,  etc.  Then  there  is 
the cost of the infrastructure required to support the surge rates needed for multiple 
launches  of  smaller  launch  vehicles  that  would  be  required  during  a  lunar  or  Mars 
campaign.  This  combined  with  all  of  the  associated  operational  costs  make  the  use 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

of smaller launch vehicles for exploration missions cost prohibitive. Add to that the 
impact on mission reliability as a result of performing so many launches and associ-
ated  on-orbit  assembly  operations  and  one  quickly  realizes  that  the  chances  of  ac-
complishing  multiple  moon  or  Mars  missions  using  smaller  launch  vehicles  is  slim 
to none. 

A heavy lift launch vehicle eliminates costly and complex in-space docking and on-
orbit assembly and all of the associated supporting hardware, testing, checkout, and 
sustaining  operations.  Most  significantly,  a  heavy  lift  launch  vehicle  simplifies  the 
exploration architecture driving down costs for sustaining and logistics. 

In combination with the heavy lift launch capability, it is equally important to le-
verage existing human rated propulsion elements and focus on the safest way to put 
the  crew  in  space.  Utilizing  a  single  Space  Shuttle  reusable  solid  rocket  motor  for 
the  first  stage  of  the  crew  launch  vehicle  is  an  ideal  application  of  simplicity.  The 
motor is already human rated and has an outstanding proven safety and reliability 
record.  Add  to  this  reusable  first  stage  a  previously  developed  human  rated  2nd 
stage rocket engine, either a simplified version of the Apollo engine that took astro-
nauts  to  the  moon,  the  J–2S,  or  a  Space  Shuttle  main  engine  and  you  have  a  very 
simple, cost effective launch vehicle solution, built upon human rated heritage. 

Albert  Einstein  once  said:  ‘‘make  everything  as  simple  as  possible,  but  not  any 
simpler’’. The crew launch vehicle that I just described is the simplest launch vehi-
cle  that  can  deliver  almost  50,000  pounds  to  Low  Earth  Orbit.  This  simplicity  and 
use  of  highly  reliable  components  results  in  the  safest  launch  vehicle  possible  for 
transporting astronauts to space. In fact a recent reliability and crew safety assess-
ment  of  the  SRB/J–2S  Launch  Vehicle  conducted  by  Science  Applications  Inter-
national  Corporation  (Attachment  2:  SAICNY05–04–1F,  1  April  2005)  concluded 
‘‘. . . the  SRB/J–2S  derived  launch  vehicle  forecasted  crew  safety  level,  as  meas-
ured  in  missions  where  the  crew  is  lost  in  a  total  number  of  missions,  is  1  in 
3,145 . . .’’  This  is  an  order  of  magnitude  better  than  today’s  capabilities.  Another 
important  feature  of  this  design  is  that  it  has  sufficient  performance  to  fly  trajec-
tories to orbit that are compatible with a crew escape system. Other launch vehicles 
with insufficient thrust require the launch vehicle to fly higher, steeper, and longer, 
exposing  the  crew  to  extensive  periods  (up  to  three  times  longer)  where  a  simple 
ballistic crew escape is not survivable. 

The  other  major  benefit  of  this  evolved  approach  is  that  because  of  its  simplicity 
and  reliance  on  already  developed  hardware,  this  launch  vehicle  can  be  available 
soon.  In  fact,  a  demonstration  launch  could  be  conducted  in  2008  and  be  ready  to 
fly the CEV about when the Shuttle is scheduled for retirement. We could also have 
the heavy lift version ready at about the same time, and by leveraging the resources 
of  the  current  shuttle  program  we  could  save  significant  dollars.  We  have  the  tal-
ented workforce, facilities, and most of the major hardware components in hand. By 
evolving  what  we  have  and  only  developing  new  components  where  needed,  we  can 
drastically reduce the cost and schedule to provide the capabilities we need to safely 
transport  astronauts  to  orbit  and  provide  the  heavy  lift  required  to  conduct  space 
exploration. 

The  approach  that  I  have  described  also  provides  a  means  of  safely  transitioning 
from  the  current  Space  Shuttle  System  to  the  launch  system  required  to  support 
the  Exploration  Vision.  The  SRB/J–2S  launch  vehicle  could  easily  be  used  to  carry 
crew  and  cargo  to  the  International  Space  Station,  or  be  used  as  a  highly  reliable 
payload carrier to support U.S. assured access to space requirements. 

By  leveraging  the  current  Space  Shuttle  resources  we  have  the  ability  to  get  as-
tronauts  to/from  Low  Earth  Orbit,  an  order  of  magnitude  safer  than  we  do  today, 
for a very affordable cost and on a schedule that avoids a ‘‘gap’’ in U.S. human space 
flight capability. We also have the propulsive backbone of the Space Shuttle System 
today that is proven and ready to provide a cost effective heavy lift capability need-
ed  to  do  exciting  exploration  of  the  moon  and  enable  us  to  reach  Mars  and  beyond. 
In  summary  we  have  a  Safe,  Simple  solution  that  we  can  have  Soon.  We  owe  it 
to our children and future generations to do so. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  share  my  thoughts  with  you,  I  will  be  pleased 

to respond to any questions that you may have. 
Attachment 1

TO: CA/Director, Flight Crew Operations 
FROM: CB/Chief, Astronaut Office 

NASA, LYNDON B. JOHNSON SPACE CENTER 

Houston, TX, May 4, 2004

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

RE: CB–04–044, SUBJECT: ASTRONAUT OFFICE POSITION ON FUTURE LAUNCH 
SYSTEM SAFETY

The  Columbia  disaster  has  precipitated  a  thorough  re-evaluation  of  all  aspects  of 
space  flight.  The  accompanying  paper  presents  the  Astronaut  Office  position  on 
launch vehicle safety for the next generation of human-rated spacecraft. 

KENT V. ROMINGER 

ENCLOSURE: ASTRONAUT OFFICE POSITION ON FUTURE LAUNCH SYSTEM SAFETY 

Executive Summary 

The  Columbia  accident,  the  selection  of  a  booster  for  the  Orbital  Space  Plane 
(OSP),  and  NASA’s  recently  renewed  interest  in  exploring  beyond  low  Earth  orbit 
have  led  the  Astronaut  Office  to  reexamine  its  views  on  launch  system  safety.  Al-
though flying in space will always involve some measure of risk, it is our consensus 
that an order-of-magnitude reduction in the risk of loss of human life during ascent, 
compared to the Space Shuttle, is both achievable with current technology and con-
sistent with NASA’s focus on steadily improving rocket reliability, and should there-
fore  represent  a  minimum  safety  benchmark  for  future  systems.  To  reach  that  tar-
get, the Astronaut Office offers the following recommendations. 

The  Astronaut  Office  recommends  that  the  next  human-rated  launch  system  add 
abort  or  escape  systems  to  a  booster  with  ascent  reliability  at  least  as  high  as  the 
Space Shuttle’s, yielding a predicted probability of 0.999 or better for crew survival 
during ascent. The system should be designed to achieve or exceed its reliability re-
quirement with 95 percent confidence. 

The Astronaut Office recommends that new human-rated launch vehicle programs 
follow guidelines, such as those given in the Columbia Accident Investigation Board 
(CAIB)  Report  and  NASA’s  Human  Rating  Requirements  (NPG  8705),  for  safety-
conscious  management,  requirements  definition,  concept  development,  and  design 
selection. 

The  Astronaut  Office  recommends  that  NASA  specify  and  maintain  a  set  of  for-
mal, standardized, complete methods and processes to be used in predicting the reli-
ability  of  human-rated  spacecraft,  and  identify  or  create  an  independent  body  to 
verify those analyses. 

The Astronaut Office recommends that the test program for the next human-rated 
launch system demonstrate its reliability through vigorous ground and flight testing 
of  components  and  systems.  The  value  of  each  test  should  be  leveraged  by  proving 
a safe envelope larger than that expected during operations and by using flight data 
to  validate  system  reliability  models.  After  completion  of  the  formal  test  program, 
the  vigilance  applied  during  testing  to  data  gathering,  analysis,  and  flight  con-
straints  should  continue  to  be  applied  during  operations.  Reliability  should  be  con-
tinuously reassessed. 

The Astronaut Office believes that the next human-rated spacecraft must include 
a  robust  full-envelope  abort  or  escape  system.  The  safety  of  the  overall  system  de-
pends on the reliability of both the booster and the abort or escape system. As with 
the rocket itself, the abort or escape system reliability must be proven through flight 
testing. 
I. Introduction 

Flying  in  space  will  always  involve  some  measure  of  risk.  Astronauts  are  willing 
to  accept  significant  risks  to  further  the  cause  of  space  exploration.  Nevertheless, 
the  Astronaut  Office  believes  that  future  spacecraft  can  and  should  be  much  safer 
than present systems. 

The  CAIB,  in  its  2003  report,  advised  NASA  to  adopt  flight  safety  as  its  ‘‘over-
riding  priority.’’  In  hearings  following  the  loss  of  Columbia,  members  of  Congress 
agreed with that recommendation, emphasizing that improved safety is essential to 
maintaining NASA’s credibility with both the public and Congress. 

Shortly  after  the  Columbia  accident,  the  OSP  Program  released  its  Level  1  Re-
quirements  and  Operational  Concepts.  These  stated  in  part  that,  ‘‘The  vehicle(s) 
shall initially launch on an [expendable launch vehicle] ELV,’’ referring to the Atlas 
V  and  Delta  IV  ELVs.  These  rockets  belong  to  a  family  of  vehicles  with  a  success 
rate of 0.975. Even with extensive modifications, they may never achieve a meaning-
fully  higher  success  rate. 1 For  comparison,  the  success  rate  of  the  Space  Shuttle  if 
viewed solely as a launch vehicle is 0.991 (one ascent failure in 113 flights, counting 
the  Columbia  accident  as  an  entry  failure  because  it  achieved  a  safe  orbit  after 
launch). 

Although  history  has  shown  that  deadly  accidents  can  occur  during  any  phase  of 
flight,  ascent  still  poses  a  major  risk  to  human  life.  If  we  wish  to  send  explorers 
into  space  on  increasingly  ambitious  missions,  we  must  first  solve  the  problem  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

putting humans into orbit more safely than is possible with our current launch sys-
tems. 

The  Columbia  accident,  the  selection  of  a  booster  for  the  OSP,  and  NASA’s  re-
cently renewed interest in exploring beyond low Earth orbit have led the Astronaut 
Office to reexamine its views on launch system safety. Although flying in space will 
always involve some measure of risk, it is our consensus that an order-of-magnitude 
reduction  in  the  risk  of  loss  of  human  life  during  ascent,  compared  to  the  Space 
Shuttle,  is  both  achievable  with  current  technology  and  consistent  with  NASA’s 
focus on steadily improving rocket reliability, and should therefore represent a min-
imum safety benchmark for future systems. 
II. Flight Safety and Reliability 

Flight safety means protecting the lives of the crew as the top priority, above cost, 
manpower,  reusability,  adherence  to  schedule,  and  all  other  considerations,  given 
that we are undertaking a dangerous mission and that our resources are finite. 

Flight  safety  is  not  just  a  philosophical  viewpoint.  It  is  also  a  measurable  quan-
tity: the reliability of the systems upon which the crew’s safety depends. But accord-
ing to reliability theory, 2 it is not possible to measure a vehicle’s reliability exactly. 
Instead, the probability of a safe flight must be estimated using mathematical mod-
els, flight history, or a combination of both. 

In  this  paper,  we  define  ascent  as  the  time  from  crew  arrival  at  the  launch  pad 
until  insertion  into  an  orbit  that  is  safe  for  at  least  24  hours,  or,  in  cases  where 
such an orbit is not reached, until crew recovery by rescue forces on Earth. We will 
use  three  statistical  definitions  of  ascent  reliability:  predicted  reliability,  success 
rate, and demonstrated reliability. 

Predicted reliability is an estimate of reliability, made in the absence of sufficient 
flight  data,  through  the  use  of  probabilistic  risk  assessment  or  other  trustworthy 
modeling  techniques.  Its  accuracy  is  limited  because  it  relies  on  an  incomplete  un-
derstanding of the machine and its environment and usually takes into account only 
known  failure  modes.  As  flight  data  becomes  available,  it  can  be  included  in  the 
models to improve the accuracy of reliability predictions. 

A  rocket’s  success  rate  is  the  number  of  times  it  has  safely  reached  orbit,  divided 
by the number of times it has been launched. For piloted missions, we count a flight 
reaching an incorrect but safe orbit as a success, since it does not threaten the lives 
of  the  crew  even  if  the  mission  is  lost.  Success  rate  is  not  the  same  as  reliability. 
But  with  enough  launches  the  success  rate  will  gradually  become  an  accurate  esti-
mate of reliability. 

Demonstrated  reliability  is  an  estimate  of  reliability  based  on  the  success  rate, 

with allowances for statistical uncertainty. 

Even  a  ‘‘mature’’  launch  system  with  a  long  flight  history  has  significant  uncer-
tainty  in  its  reliability.  To  reflect  that  uncertainty,  every  reliability  estimate  must 
include  a  confidence  level,  which  allows  for  the  possibility  that  a  rocket’s  modeled 
performance  or  existing  safety  record,  because  of  analytical  errors  or  random 
chance,  does  not  reflect  the  truth.  A  standard  confidence  level  is  95  percent,  mean-
ing that there is only a 5 percent chance that the system’s real reliability is outside 
the  bounds  of  the  estimate. 3 A  lower  confidence  level  means  a  greater  probability 
that the actual value of reliability falls outside the range of the estimate. For rock-
ets carrying people, where low reliability is of greatest concern, a reduced confidence 
level corresponds to a greater likelihood of unrecognized danger. 

Demonstrated  reliability  estimates  at  95  percent  confidence  will  be  very  low  for 
new  systems  when  the  number  of  flights  is  small.  This  is  because  even  an 
untrustworthy  system  can  succeed  a  few  times  by  random  chance.  It  is  just  this 
kind  of  chance  that  the  confidence  level  is  intended  to  compensate  for.  (Confidence 
levels  are  less  important  if  data  from  hundreds  or  thousands  of  flights  is  available 
to reduce the statistical uncertainty in the reliability estimate to an acceptably low 
value.  Such  a  rich  test  history  is  characteristic  of  airplane  programs,  but  not  of 
launch  systems  in  the  past  or  near  future.)  Note  that  the  Shuttle  was  declared 
‘‘operational’’  at  a  time  when  its  demonstrated  reliability  could  only  be  said  to  be 
better than 0.473 with 95 percent confidence. 

We now apply these concepts to the reliability of future human-rated launch sys-
tems. As we discuss below, adding abort or escape systems to a booster with an as-
cent  reliability  at  least  as  high  as  the  Space  Shuttle’s  could  yield  a  future  launch 
system with an order-of-magnitude less ascent risk than the Shuttle. Such a system, 
which the Astronaut Office believes is feasible using present technology and produc-
tion  processes,  would  answer  the  call  for  meaningfully  improved  flight  safety  as 
called  for  by  Congress,  the  CAIB, 4 and  the  Astronaut  Office. 5 It  is  also  consistent 
with  the  ascent  risk  requirement  accepted  by  the  former  OSP  Program.  This  new 
safety  benchmark  corresponds  to  a  predicted  probability  of  0.999  or  better  for  crew 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

survival during ascent. If flown enough times, it should demonstrate the same reli-
ability.  To  ensure  that  a  new  system  achieves  its  safety  requirement,  it  should  be 
designed to meet or exceed that value with the standard 95 percent confidence. 

The  Astronaut  Office  recommends  that  the  next  human-rated  launch  system  add 
abort  or  escape  systems  to  a  booster  with  ascent  reliability  at  least  as  high  as  the 
Space Shuttle’s, yielding a predicted probability of 0.999 or better for crew survival 
during ascent. The system should be designed to achieve or exceed its reliability re-
quirement with 95 percent confidence. 
III. Managing and Designing for Flight Safety 

Designing  significantly  safer  space  vehicles  requires  adopting  flight  safety  as  the 
overarching  figure  of  merit  and  implementing  measures  that  have  been  shown  to 
minimize risk, including those outlined in the CAIB Report. 4 Practices of safety-con-
scious  flight  programs  include  the  following:  Systems  should  be  assumed  to  be  un-
safe  until  proven  otherwise.  Waivers  should  not  be  accepted  without  rigorous  tech-
nical justification. Expert advice from outside the organization should be sought and 
heeded to assess program management, vehicle design, construction, test, and oper-
ations. Safety must never be compromised by cost, schedule, or other considerations. 
The  concepts  of  programmatic  risk  (to  cost  and  schedule)  and  operational  risk  (to 
life and property) must be carefully separated. 

Requirements,  especially  safety  requirements,  for  a  human-rated  launch  vehicle 
must  be  specific,  unambiguous,  and  verifiable.  New  programs  must  follow  NASA’s 
Human Rating Requirements (NPG 8705), protect those requirements from unneces-
sary ‘‘tailoring,’’ weakening, and abandonment, and ensure that they are met. 

Thorough,  objective  trade  studies  must  be  done  to  identify  the  design  that  best 
meets the requirements. Choices of technology and architecture should be guided by 
flight safety over cost, schedule, or any other priority. 

New  programs  should  choose  conservative,  simple  designs,  which  are  usually 
safer.  They  should  adopt  proven  design  standards  and  analytical  approaches.  De-
signs should preserve healthy margins and factors of safety, and employ redundancy 
in critical systems. Human rating should be designed in, not appended on. Well-un-
derstood,  high-quality,  high-reliability  materials,  components,  and  architectures 
should be selected. Hardware and software should be designed to degrade gracefully 
rather than fail catastrophically. The system must provide human insight into sub-
systems  and  allow  human  intervention  during  failures.  Future  improvements  and 
supplementary  backup  systems  must  not  be  assumed  to  adequately  substitute  for 
a good basic design. 

The Astronaut Office recommends that new human-rated launch vehicle programs 
follow guidelines, such as those given in the CAIB Report and NASA’s Human Rat-
ing Requirements (NPG 8705), for safety-conscious management, requirements defi-
nition, concept development, and design selection. 
IV. Predicted Reliability of New Designs 

History has shown that rocket developers may exaggerate the merits of their sys-
tems.  An  early  claim  for  the  Space  Shuttle’s  probability  of  crew  survival  was 
0.99999,  thousands  of  times  safer  than  later  demonstrated. 6 Because  safety  is  the 
most  important  consideration  for  human-rated  space  vehicles,  predicted  reliability 
must be quantitatively understood at all stages of design. 

A  long  record  of  successful  flights  is  the  best  way  to  demonstrate  flight  safety. 
When  a  new  system  lacks  enough  flight  history  to  support  reliability  claims,  test 
results  are  the  next  best  choice.  During  early  development  there  is  no  hardware  to 
test, so reliability must be predicted using state-of-the-art modeling techniques such 
as  probabilistic  risk  assessment.  Unfortunately,  predicted  reliability  figures  can  be 
suspect, even if they are produced using modern, standardized techniques. The sys-
tem  developer  owns  the  proprietary  data  upon  which  the  models  are  based  and 
these data are rarely shared for independent verification. Complex reliability models 
contain numerous parameters that are uncertain or subject to interpretation. (Mod-
els  of  this  kind  are  notorious  for  being  able  to  produce  any  answer  the  modeler 
wants  to  obtain.)  Some  reliability  models  treat  only  component  failures,  neglecting 
human  errors  in  processing  and  operations.  Finally,  most  reliability  models  treat 
only known modes of failure and may miss significant risks from unforeseen causes, 
especially unintended interactions between parts of a complex system (such as foam 
from the Shuttle’s external tank striking the wing leading edge). 

Greater  confidence  in  predicted  reliability  numbers  can  be  realized  in  several 
ways.  One  is  to  specify  standard  modeling  methods  for  producing  them.  Another  is 
to  validate  them  through  independent  third-party  verification  using  separately  de-
veloped models. It may also be possible to truth-test reliability models against com-
parable  existing  systems  with  more  precisely  known  reliability.  Many  models  can 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

be  made  more  realistic  by  expanding  them  to  include  human  errors  in  processing 
and operations as well as the possibility of unanticipated failure modes. Verification 
of this kind is difficult to obtain, but the powerful influence of model reliability esti-
mates in determining the ultimate safety of the design (and hence the ultimate suc-
cess  of  the  program)  demands  thorough  validation  of  the  models  and  their  results. 
The  Astronaut  Office  recommends  that  NASA  specify  and  maintain  a  set  of  for-
mal, standardized, complete methods and processes to be used in predicting the reli-
ability  of  human-rated  spacecraft,  and  identify  or  create  an  independent  body  to 
verify those analyses. 
V. Verifying Flight Safety Through Testing and Operations 

Once  hardware  is  built,  its  reliability  can  be  accurately  assessed,  first  through 
testing  and  later  during  operations.  Because  testing  will  expose  the  vulnerabilities 
in  a  system  more  accurately  and  more  realistically  than  analysis,  vigorous  testing 
to  qualify  all  levels  of  the  system,  including  individual  and  integrated  components, 
on  the  ground  and  in  flight  is  essential.  Flight  testing  should  progressively  expand 
the  envelope,  following  proven  aviation  practices.  Test  flights  should  identify  the 
system’s weakest parts and exercise them most strenuously. The flight test program 
must  demonstrate  that  the  system’s  reliability  meets  the  requirements,  either 
through  the  sheer  number  of  tests,  through  proving  a  safe  envelope  much  larger 
than  expected  during  operations,  through  validation  of  system  models,  or  through 
a combination of all three. 

The formal test program for a new commercial or military airplane involves hun-
dreds  of  test  flights.  The  large  number  of  tests  yields  complete,  precise  under-
standing  of  the  hardware  and  its  performance.  Such  a  comprehensive  test  program 
for  a  new  spacecraft  is  likely  to  be  prohibitively  expensive.  It  is  therefore  expected 
that  the  next  new  human-rated  spacecraft  will  be  much  less  well  understood  than 
the  next  new  military  airplane  when  it  goes  into  operation.  Accordingly,  even  after 
completion  of  a  formal  test  program,  the  spacecraft  should  still  be  operated  as 
though  it  were  an  experimental  vehicle.  Operational  practices  associated  with  this 
paradigm  include  collection,  archiving,  and  timely  analysis  of  data  on  the  health 
and  performance  of  all  systems.  All  anomalies  should  be  recorded,  tracked,  and  ag-
gressively  investigated.  Unresolved  anomalies  should  be  considered  constraints  to 
flight.  The  system’s  reliability  estimates  and  their  underlying  models  must  be  con-
tinuously refined to reflect the vehicle’s actual performance. An ancillary advantage 
of  such  an  operational  paradigm  is  that  it  will  formally  identify  and  capture  ideas 
that will be useful in further improving the safety of current and future launch ve-
hicles. 

The Astronaut Office recommends that the test program for the next human-rated 
launch system demonstrate its reliability through vigorous ground and flight testing 
of  components  and  systems.  The  value  of  each  test  should  be  leveraged  by  proving 
a safe envelope larger than that expected during operations and by using flight data 
to  validate  system  reliability  models.  After  completion  of  the  formal  test  program, 
the  vigilance  applied  during  testing  to  data  gathering,  analysis,  and  flight  con-
straints  should  continue  to  be  applied  during  operations.  Reliability  should  be  con-
tinuously reassessed. 
VI. Improving Ascent Safety with Abort and Escape Systems 

The  current  benchmark  for  ascent  reliability  is  the  Space  Shuttle’s  success  rate 
of 0.991. Existing commercial rockets have lower success rates. 1 Given the low reli-
ability of even the safest existing rockets, meeting the Astronaut Office’s goal of an 
order-of-magnitude reduction in the risk of space flight will require making the risk 
of  losing  the  crew  much  smaller  than  the  risk  of  losing  the  booster.  This  can  be 
achieved  by  adding  abort  and  escape  systems.  The  ‘‘Astronaut  Office  Position  on 
Crew  Survivability  During  Ascent  and  Entry’’ 5 defines  an  ‘‘abort’’  as  a  failure  case 
where the crew stays in the part of the spacecraft normally designed to carry them 
during  entry,  as  with  an  Apollo-style  tractor  rocket.  ‘‘Escape’’  means  that  the  crew 
leaves the crew compartment after the failure, as with an escape pod, ejection seats, 
or bailout capability. A successful abort or escape is one in which the crew survives 
abort  or  escape  initiation,  separation  from  the  booster,  descent  and  landing,  await-
ing  rescue  forces,  and  being  securely  recovered  by  those  forces.  All  elements  in-
volved  in  abort  or  escape  flight,  landing,  post-landing  survival,  and  rescue  efforts 
are  considered  part  of  the  abort  or  escape  system.  Portions  of  the  flight  trajectory 
where abort and escape are impossible are called ‘‘black zones.’’ Because the overall 
safety of the system depends so strongly on the abort or escape system, black zones 
greatly increase overall flight risk. They should therefore be minimized to the fullest 
extent possible. The safest design will include a ‘‘full envelope’’ abort or escape sys-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

31

tem,  which  provides  the  crew  with  a  secondary  way  to  survive  vehicle  failures  at 
all points in the flight profile. 

Abort  and  escape  systems  must  operate  very  quickly  and  precisely,  may  need  to 
withstand the detonation of hundreds of tons of explosive propellants in close prox-
imity,  must  perform  across  a  wide  and  never  fully  understood  range  of  conditions, 
and may drop the crew compartment onto inhospitable locations on the Earth’s sur-
face  where  the  crew  might  wait  days  to  be  rescued.  The  reliability  of  an  abort  or 
escape system must include its ability to save the crew from all credible failures at 
all  times  during  ascent,  and  its  ability  to  protect  them  after  separation  from  the 
rocket until recovery by rescue forces. 

Abort  and  escape  systems  can  never  be  perfectly  reliable.  Historically,  about  13 
percent  of  rocket  accidents  have  involved  catastrophic  stack  failures  occurring  with 
so  little  warning  that  notional  abort  or  escape  systems  likely  could  not  have  saved 
a  crew  on  board. 1 Considering  the  challenges  of  separation  alone,  abort  or  escape 
system reliability figures higher than about 0.87 may be difficult to achieve without 
specifically  designing  the  booster  to  fail  only  in  benign  ways.  Even  if  separation 
from the failing booster is successful, abort descents, landings, and rescue scenarios 
are  more  difficult  to  survive  than  their  nominal  counterparts,  implying  an  overall 
abort  or  escape  system  reliability  even  lower  than  0.87.  Because  of  the  abort  or  es-
cape  system’s  vital  role  in  protecting  the  lives  of  the  crew,  its  reliability  estimates 
must be comprehensive and realistic during the design phase, and supported by rig-
orous flight-testing after hardware exists. 

The table below shows how the rate of fatal accidents depends on the reliabilities 
of the booster and the abort or escape system. To clearly illustrate the effect of both 
parameters, we convert ordinary reliability figures (e.g., 0.999) to expected numbers 
of  fatal  accidents  per  1,000  launches.  Presented  in  this  format,  the  Space  Shuttle’s 
0.991 ascent success rate becomes 9 fatal accidents per 1,000 launches, and the As-
tronaut Office safety target of 0.999 is one fatal accident per 1,000 launches. In the 
table, green denotes combinations of booster and abort system reliabilities that meet 
that target. Systems with two or fewer fatal accidents per 1,000 launches are shown 
in yellow. 

Table 1. Fatal ascent accidents per 1,000 launches, for different values of booster 

and abort or escape system reliability.

The table shows that if the abort or escape system has a reliability of 0.900 (cho-
sen  as  a  reasonable  upper  limit,  following  the  discussion  above  and  presuming  a 
booster designed not to fail catastrophically, so that the abort or escape system reli-
ability  can  exceed  0.87),  the  Astronaut  Office  safety  target  of  1  fatal  accident  per 
1,000 launches can be reached only by selecting a booster with a reliability of 0.990 
or  better.  Existing  commercial  rockets  have  demonstrated  reliabilities  near  0.950 
with 95 percent confidence. 1 The Space Shuttle, if viewed solely as a launch vehicle, 
has  a  high  success  rate  of  0.991,  but  applying  the  standard  95  percent  confidence 
level puts its demonstrated reliability near 0.960. A new booster design that avoids 
complex,  fragile,  and  unproven  technologies  and  architectures  while  embracing  the 
more  extensive  testing,  design  margins,  process  control,  instrumentation,  operator 
intervention,  and  fault  tolerance  characteristic  of  current  human-rated  flight  hard-
ware might achieve or exceed 0.990 reliability with high confidence. 

The Astronaut Office believes that the next human-rated spacecraft must include 
a  robust  full-envelope  abort  or  escape  system.  The  safety  of  the  overall  system  de-
pends on the reliability of both the booster and the abort or escape system. As with 
the rocket itself, the abort or escape system reliability must be proven through flight 
testing. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1
o
r
o
h

32

VII. Launching Humans on Atlas V and Delta IV Boosters 

The possibility of using the current Atlas V and Delta IV rockets to launch a new, 
piloted spacecraft has led the Astronaut Office to look closely at the crew safety im-
plications of this option.

• According  to  the  OSP–ELV  Human  Flight  Safety  Certification  Study  Team  Re-
port, 1 the  Atlas  V  and  Delta  IV  rockets  do  not  meet  many  of  the  NASA  safety 
standards  specified  or  referenced  in  NPG  8705,  the  Human  Rating  Require-
ments.  Major  changes  needed  to  bring  the  vehicles  into  compliance  would  in-
clude  at  least:  adding  failure  tolerance  for  critical  systems,  redesigning  for 
greater  structural  safety  factors  (human-rated  spacecraft  use  1.4;  Atlas  V  and 
Delta  IV  rockets  use  1.25),  adding  fault  detection  and  isolation  functions,  mak-
ing the range destruct philosophy compatible with maximum crew survivability, 
wiring for insight and intervention by the crew and ground control, performing 
the detailed risk analyses needed for human rating, supplementing process con-
trols  in  all  phases  of  production,  and  flight  testing  to  human  rating  standards.
• The Atlas V and Delta IV boosters were built to be cost-effective for their manu-
facturers, insurers, and customers, considering the value of the non-human pay-
loads  they  were  designed  to  carry.  Although  cost-effectiveness  includes  reli-
ability  considerations,  safety  is  not  the  prime  driver  for  satellite  launches.  The 
expense  of  human  rating  these  existing  rockets  by  adding  design  margins,  re-
dundancy,  instrumentation,  process  control,  command  capability,  and  testing, 
might make them uneconomical for their original mission and could potentially 
be as costly as building a new human-rated booster.

• The  reliability  of  Atlas  V  and  Delta  IV  rockets  is  not  precisely  known  because 
they  are  too  new.  Given  insufficient  flight  data,  one  method  for  predicting  reli-
ability is to assume that a new system is about as reliable as a similar, existing 
system.  The  OSP–ELV  Human  Flight  Safety  Certification  Study  Team 1 used 
the  flight  record  of  Atlas,  Delta,  and  Titan  rockets  developed  under  U.S.  Gov-
ernment contracts and launched since 1990 to predict the reliability of the Atlas 
V  and  Delta  IV.  These  rockets  have  been  launched  236  times  and  reached  safe 
orbits  230  times.  The  resulting  reliability  estimate  is  0.950  or  better  with  95 
percent  confidence.  The  boosters’  potentially  low  reliability  would  place  exces-
sive burden on abort mechanisms to save the crew. The abort or escape system 
would need a reliability near 0.980 for the complete launch system to meet the 
Astronaut  Office  crew  survivability  target.  Proposed  abort  and  escape  systems 
were  judged  to  be  incapable  of  rescuing  the  crew  from  stack  detonations  occur-
ring  with  little  or  no  warning. 1 These  failures  occur  often  enough  to  prevent 
even  a  high-reliability  abort  or  escape  system  from  meeting  its  safety  require-
ment. 1

• Atlas  V  and  Delta  IV  boosters  fly  to  orbit  on  highly  lofted  trajectories  because 
of second-stage performance limitations and range destruct line-of-sight require-
ments.  If  a  piloted  spacecraft  had  to  abort  near  the  apex  of  such  a  trajectory, 
it  would  hit  the  atmosphere  at  a  high  speed  and  a  steep  angle.  The  resulting 
heat and acceleration loads on the crew compartment would be severe and pos-
sibly not survivable. 7

In  summary,  the  Atlas  V  and  Delta  IV  rockets  should  be  measured  against  a  set 
of  concrete,  specific,  verifiable  requirements  for  carrying  humans  before  being  se-
lected for that purpose. A safer launch option might be identified by objectively com-
paring  the  advantages  and  drawbacks  of  a  range  of  existing,  modified,  and  new 
launch systems relative to those requirements. 
VIII. Summary and Conclusion 

If  we  wish  to  send  explorers  into  space  on  increasingly  ambitious  missions,  we 
must  first  solve  the  problem  of  getting  humans  into  orbit  more  safely  than  is  pos-
sible with our current launch systems. 

The Astronaut Office believes that an order-of-magnitude reduction in the risk of 
loss of human life during ascent, compared to the Space Shuttle, is both achievable 
with  current  technology  and  consistent  with  NASA’s  focus  on  steadily  improving 
rocket  reliability,  and  should  therefore  represent  a  minimum  safety  benchmark  for 
future  systems.  This  corresponds  to  a  predicted  ascent  reliability  of  at  least  0.999. 
To  ensure  that  a  new  system  will  achieve  or  surpass  its  safety  requirement,  it 
should  be  designed  and  tested  to  do  so  with  a  statistical  confidence  level  of  95  per-
cent. 

Tough  safety  requirements  can  be  met  in  part  by  adopting  the  best  practices  for 
the  management,  design,  test,  and  operation  of  risky  technology  as  given  in  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

CAIB Report, in NASA’s Human Rating Requirements (NPG 8705), and in commer-
cial and military aviation. 

The  burden  of  proving  that  a  vehicle  is  safe  falls  on  the  mathematical  models, 
tests, and operational history that measure the system’s reliability. Accordingly, the 
Astronaut  Office  recommends  that  NASA  specify  and  maintain  a  set  of  formal, 
standardized  methods  and  processes  to  be  used  in  predicting  the  reliability  of 
human-rated  spacecraft,  and  identify  or  create  an  independent  body  to  verify  those 
analyses.  We  further  recommend  that  the  test  program  for  the  next  human-rated 
launch system demonstrate its reliability through vigorous ground and flight testing 
of  components  and  systems.  The  value  of  each  test  should  be  leveraged  by  proving 
a safe envelope larger than that expected during operations and by using flight data 
to  validate  system  reliability  models.  After  completion  of  the  formal  test  program, 
the  vigilance  applied  during  testing  to  data  gathering,  analysis,  and  flight  con-
straints  should  continue  to  be  applied  during  operations.  Reliability  should  be  con-
tinuously reassessed. 

The Astronaut Office believes that the next human-rated spacecraft must include 
a robust full-envelope abort or escape system. The reliability of both the rocket and 
the  abort  or  escape  system  are  limited  and  must  be  proven  through  flight-testing. 
It  is  our  hope  that  NASA  will  adopt  the  principles  outlined  in  this  paper  to  de-
sign, build, test, and fly a new vehicle that is much safer than its existing counter-
parts.  Such  a  vehicle  will  help  ensure  that  our  nation  retains  the  capability  for 
human access to space. 

REFERENCES: 

1 OSP–ELV Human Flight Safety Certification Study Team Report (2004). 
2 Trochim,  W.,  The  Research  Methods  Knowledge  Base,  2nd  Edition.  Atomic  Dog 

Publishing, Cincinnati, 2000. 

3 Taylor,  J.R.,  An  Introduction  to  Error  Analysis:  The  Study  of  Uncertainties  in 

Physical Measurements, University Science Books, Mill Valley, California, 1982. 

4 Gehman, H.W. et al. Columbia Accident Investigation Board Report, 2003. 
5 Astronaut Office Position on Crew Survivability During Ascent and Entry. Astro-

naut Office memo number CB 03–070, 2003. 

6 Feynman, R.P., Personal observations on the reliability of the Shuttle. Report of 
the  Presidential  Commission  on  the  Space  Shuttle  Challenger  Accident,  Volume  II, 
Appendix F, 1986. 

7 Orbital Space Plane RAC 2.02a Final Report (2003). 

ATTACHMENT 2

Executive Summary from SAICNY05–04–1F, ‘‘Reliability and Crew Safety Assess-
ment  for  Solid  Rocket  Booster/J–2S  Based  Launch  Vehicle,’’  Joseph  R.  Fragola, 
Blake  Putney,  Joseph  Minarick  III,  Joseph  D.  Baum,  Benjamin  Franzini,  Orlando 
Soto, Rainald Lo¨hner, Eric Mestreau, Richard Ferricane, 1 April 2005. 

NASA’s Exploration Mission Directorate is currently developing plans to carry out 
the  President’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration.  This  plan  includes  retiring  the  Space 
Shuttle  by  2010  and  developing  the  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle  (CEV)  to  transport 
astronauts to/from Low Earth Orbit (LEO). There are several alternatives to launch 
the CEV, including Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicles (EELVs) and launch vehi-
cles derived from new and existing propulsion elements. In May 2003, the astronaut 
office  made  clear  its  position  on  the  need  and  feasibility  of  improving  crew  safety 
for future NASA manned missions indicating their ‘‘consensus that an order of mag-
nitude  reduction  in  the  risk  of  human  life  during  ascent,  compared  to  the  Space 
Shuttle, is both achievable with current technology and consistent with NASA’s focus 
on steadily improving rocket reliability.’’ The astronaut office set a goal for the Prob-
ability  of  Loss  of  Crew  (PLOC)  to  be  better  than  1  in  1,000.  Thus,  the  challenge 
becomes  finding  a  launch  vehicle  that  meets  the  CEV  launch  performance  require-
ments while satisfying the astronaut office crew survivability requirement. 

The simplest designs of the EELVs, which offer the greatest potential for inherent 
reliability,  are  the  single  core  variants.  These  single  core  EELVs  with  an  effective 
crew escape system should provide the greatest crew safety. Unfortunately, the sin-
gle  core  EELVs  are  unable  to  meet  the  performance  needs  for  the  CEV  mission,  so 
the higher performance, more complex, less reliable multi-core ‘‘heavy’’ variants are 
required  making  it  difficult  to  achieve  the  ascent  risk  goal  proposed  by  the  astro-
naut  office  for  PLOC  to  be  better  than  1  in  1,000.  This  dilemma  motivated  the 
search for a launch vehicle that could preserve the simplicity of a single core propul-
sion system that utilizes highly reliable human rated heritage components with suf-
ficient  performance  to  meet  the  CEV  mission  needs.  The  result  of  this  effort  is  a 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

2-stage  launch  vehicle  utilizing  a  single  Space  Shuttle  Solid  Rocket  Booster  (SRB) 
for the first stage, and a single J–2S engine for the second stage. 

In  order  to  effectively  evaluate  the  reliability  and  human  rating  aspects  of  all  of 
the various launch vehicle alternatives, a 13 step ‘‘top-down scenario based risk as-
sessment’’  methodology  was  developed.  This  approach  is  based  on  a  phenomeno-
logical and engineering based analysis, which is subsequently used to guide a thor-
ough  Probabilistic  Risk  Assessment  (PRA).  This  report  documents  the  results  of  an 
evaluation  conducted  by  SAIC  on  the  SRB/J–2S  based  launch  vehicle  concept  for 
launching the CEV based on this methodology. 

The  SAIC  evaluation  has  determined  that  the  SRB/J–2S  derived  launch  vehicle 
forecasted  crew  safety  level,  as  measured  in  missions  where  the  crew  is  lost  in  a 
total  number  of  missions,  is  1  in  3,145  at  the  mean  of  the  estimated  uncertainty 
distribution with associated uncertainty bounds of 1 in 11,500 at the 5th percentile, 
1  in  1,287  at  the  95th  percentile,  and  1  in  3,861  at  the  median  or  50th  percentile. 
This  forecast  is  based  on  the  conservative  assumption  that  all  catastrophic  failures 
of  the  Space  Shuttle  SRB  are  non  survivable  which  analysis  indicates  is  not  the 
case. 

The SRB/J–2S derived launch vehicle is forecasted to achieve this significant crew 

safety performance due to the following features:

1.  Simple  Inherently  Safe  Design—A  single  human-rated  SRB  first  stage  ma-
tured  through  years  of  experience  with  over  176  flights  of  the  current  design 
for  launching  crew,  combined  with  a  simple  J–2S  single  engine  upper  stage 
evolved  from  the  highly  successful  J–2  engine  system  used  on  both  the  second 
and third stages of the Saturn V. These stages have been combined in an inline 
configuration  with  the  suggested  Apollo  Command  Module  based  CEV  and 
Launch  Escape  System  (LES)  so  as  to  benefit  from  the  natural  safety  distance 
advantages and broad escape corridors provided inherently by the inline design.
2.  Design  Robustness—Historical  test  results  and  1st  principles  physics  based 
simulation show that the SRB/J–2S launch vehicle design is robust, that is, re-
sistant  to  crew  adverse  catastrophic  failure,  even  for  the  most  severe  failure 
modes.
3. Historically Low Rates of Failure—In the Space Shuttle system only the 51–
L  event  (a  non-catastrophic  failure  of  the  SRB)  has  marred  a  perfect  record  in 
226  SRBs,  with  176  consecutive  successful  uses  of  the  redesigned  SRBs.  This 
1  in  226  history,  or  0.996  launch  success  rate  is  perhaps  the  best  of  the  best 
in  launcher  history.  The  J–2S,  which  completed  273  test  firings  and  accumu-
lated  30,858  seconds  of  run  time,  was  developed  to  be  simpler  to  produce  and 
operate  than  the  J–2  engine  system  which  it  derives  its  heritage.  The  flight 
proven  J–2  engine  had  a  significant  success  record,  including  a  flawless  per-
formance from a crew safety perspective.
4. Non-Catastrophic Failure Mode Propensity—Solid rocket booster history, and 
specific design features of the SRB suggest a propensity for gradual thrust aug-
mentation  failures  which  present  less  of  a  challenge  for  crew  survival  in  the 
inline configuration, should they occur.
5.  Process  Control—The  proposed  design  offers  the  benefits  of  using  propulsion 
suppliers  with  mature  in-plant  process  control  systems  to  minimize  human 
error, which has proven to be a significant contributor to risk.
6.  Failure  Precursor  Identification  and  Correction—The  design  capitalizes  on 
the  significant  failure  precursor  identification  and  elimination  benefit  from  re-
covery, and post flight inspection of the recovered SRBs.

It  is  a  combination  of  these  six  factors,  and  not  any  one  alone,  which  suggest  a 
launch  vehicle  design  that  is  forecasted  to  produce  the  significant  crew  safety  per-
formance as assessed by this analysis.

Senator  HUTCHISON.  And  Mr.  Allen  Li  is  Director  of  Acquisition 
and  Sourcing  Management  of  the  U.S.  Government  Accountability 
Office, GAO. 
STATEMENT  OF  ALLEN  LI,  DIRECTOR,  ACQUISITION
SOURCING  MANAGEMENT,  U.S.  GOVERNMENT

AND 
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Mr. LI. Madame Chairman, Senator Nelson, Members of the Sub-
committee. As requested, I will focus my brief remarks on whether 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

35

NASA  is  positioning  itself  to  have  people  with  the  proper  skills  to 
maintain  and  operate  the  Shuttle  safely  until  the  very  last  flight. 
And  building  on  Senator  Hutchison’s  remarks  on  lessons  learned, 
I  will  also  offer  some  observations  on  NASA’s  plans  to  develop  a 
new manned spacecraft. 

Over the last 2 years NASA and its contractors have worked dili-
gently  to  return  the  Shuttle  to  flight.  Understandably,  focus  has 
been  on  STS–114.  However,  as  we  approach  the  day  when  Dis-
covery does return to space, as we all hope it will, NASA will need 
to pay more attention to activities aimed an ensuring that its Shut-
tle  workforce  has  the  critical  skills  needed  until  the  Shuttle  is  re-
tired.  It  is  this  workforce  that  is  enabling  NASA  to  soon  achieve 
Return  to  Flight.  It  is  also  the  workforce  that  will  allow  NASA  to 
finish the Space Station. 

In summary, we found in our March 2005 report that NASA had 
made  limited  progress  in  planning  efforts  for  sustaining  the  Shut-
tle  workforce  through  the  program’s  retirement.  The  Shuttle  pro-
gram  has  taken  preliminary  steps,  including  identifying  lessons 
learned  from  the  retirement  of  comparable  programs,  such  as  the 
Air  Force’s  Titan  4  rocket  program.  And  NASA’s  prime  contractor 
for Shuttle operations, United Space Alliance, has also taken some 
initial  steps  to  prepare  for  the  impact  of  the  Shuttle’s  retirement 
on its own workforce. 

However,  USA’s  progress  depends  on  NASA’s  decisions  that  af-
fect  contractor  requirements  through  the  remainder  of  the  pro-
gram. So in essence, it is waiting on NASA. 

In  our  report  we  identified  several  factors  that  have  hampered 
the Shuttle program’s planning efforts. For example, because of the 
program’s near-term focus on returning the Shuttle to flight, other 
efforts  that  will  ultimately  aid  in  determining  workforce  require-
ments  have  been  delayed.  In  addition,  program  officials  indicated 
they faced uncertainties regarding the implementation of future as-
pects of the President’s vision for space exploration. 

I will end my remarks with two observations on current plans to 
develop  the  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle,  otherwise  known  as  the 
CEV. When the Shuttle was initially designed, ease and maintain-
ability was not a major factor. But it should have been. A few years 
ago, I appeared before this Subcommittee when it reviewed the rea-
sons  behind  wiring  failures  in  the  Orbiter.  As  it  turns  out,  some 
wires,  which  are  bundled,  cracked  from  maintenance  personnel  re-
peatedly  stepping  on  them  to  access  other  parts  of  the  Orbiter.  So 
it  seems  appropriate  for  NASA  to  remember  this  lesson  and  that 
future  reusable  spacecraft  be  designed  with  maintenance  in  mind. 
Furthermore,  even  if  the  spacecraft  is  not  totally  reusable, 
producibility  will  be  a  factor  to  consider.  This  is  important  if  the 
CEV  is  to  be  the  building  block  for  the  future  and  is  produced  in 
different  forms  over  20  years.  It  would  appear  that  NASA  would 
have  much  to  gain  by  insisting  on  designs  that  can  be  efficiently 
produced and thus reduce long-term costs. 

This ends my verbal statement. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Li follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

36

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALLEN LI, DIRECTOR, ACQUISITION AND SOURCING 

MANAGEMENT, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Madam Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I am pleased to be here today to discuss how the National Aeronautics and Space 
Administration  (NASA)  is  positioning  itself  to  sustain  the  critically  skilled  Space 
Shuttle  workforce  through  the  retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle  program.  NASA  is 
in  the  midst  of  one  of  the  most  challenging  periods  in  its  history.  It  must  dem-
onstrate  that  the  Space  Shuttle  can  safely  fly  again,  begin  the  process  of  retiring 
its largest program, and at the same time prepare for the uncertain future of space 
exploration. These challenges are further exacerbated by the complex task of main-
taining  the  right  workforce  to  support  the  Space  Shuttle  program  while  ensuring 
that the skills needed for future programs are not lost. Over the next several years, 
thousands  of  NASA  civil  service  and  contractor  employees  who  support  the  Space 
Shuttle program will be impacted by decisions made about the remaining life of the 
program and implementation of exploration goals. These include decisions about the 
final number of Space Shuttle flights and about future programs, such as the Crew 
Exploration  Vehicle  (CEV).  As  requested,  my  testimony  today  will  discuss  the  ac-
tions  that  NASA  is  taking  to  position  itself  to  sustain  its  critically  skilled  Space 
Shuttle  workforce  and  the  challenges  that  the  agency  faces  in  doing  so—issues  we 
reported on to Senators Inouye and McCain in March 2005. 1 

In  summary,  we  found  that  NASA  had  made  limited  progress  in  its  planning  ef-
forts  for  sustaining  the  Space  Shuttle  workforce  through  the  program’s  retirement. 
At the time of our March 2005 report, the Space Shuttle program had taken prelimi-
nary  steps,  including  identifying  the  lessons  learned  from  the  retirement  of  com-
parable programs, such as the Air Force Titan IV Rocket Program. Further NASA’s 
prime  contractor  for  Space  Shuttle  operations—United  Space  Alliance  (USA)—had 
taken some initial steps to prepare for the impact of the Space Shuttle’s retirement 
on  its  own  workforce.  However,  its  progress  depends  on  NASA  making  decisions 
that impact contractor requirements through the remainder of the program. Timely 
action  to  address  workforce  issues,  however,  is  critical  given  the  potential  impact 
that  they  could  have  on  NASA-wide  goals.  Unaddressed,  such  issues  would  likely 
lead  to  schedule  delays  and  overstretched  funding  for  both  the  Space  Shuttle  pro-
gram  and  the  agency.  Both  NASA  and  USA  have  acknowledged  that  sustaining 
their workforces will be difficult as the Space Shuttle nears retirement, particularly 
if  a  career  path  beyond  the  Space  Shuttle’s  retirement  is  not  apparent  to  their  em-
ployees.  In  addition,  the  Federal  Government  is  facing  fiscal  challenges.  Such  chal-
lenges  call  into  question  whether  funding  for  tools,  such  as  retention  bonuses,  will 
be  available  for  the  agency  to  use  to  aid  in  retaining  the  Space  Shuttle  workforce. 
In our report we identified several factors that have hampered the Space Shuttle 
program’s  planning  efforts.  For  example,  because  of  the  program’s  near-term  focus 
on returning the Space Shuttle to flight, other efforts that will ultimately aid in de-
termining  workforce  requirements,  such  as  assessing  hardware  and  facility  needs, 
are being delayed. In addition, program officials indicated that they face uncertain-
ties  regarding  the  implementation  of  future  aspects  of  the  President’s  vision  for 
space  exploration  (Vision)  and  have  yet  to  define  requirements  on  which  workforce 
planning  efforts  would  be  based.  Despite  these  factors,  our  prior  work  on  strategic 
workforce  planning  has  shown  that,  even  when  faced  with  uncertainty,  successful 
organizations  take  steps,  such  as  scenario  planning,  to  better  position  themselves 
to meet future workforce requirements. 

In our March 2005 report, we recommended that the agency begin identifying the 
Space Shuttle program’s future workforce needs based upon various future scenarios 
the  program  could  face.  The  program  can  use  the  information  provided  by  scenario 
planning  to  develop  strategies  for  meeting  the  needs  of  its  potential  future  sce-
narios. NASA concurred with our recommendation, and NASA’s Assistant Associate 
Administrator for the Space Shuttle program is leading an effort to address the rec-
ommendation. Since we issued our report and made our recommendation, NASA has 
taken action and publicly recognized, through its Integrated Space Operations Sum-
mit,  that  human  capital  management  and  critical  skills  retention  will  be  a  major 
challenge  for  the  agency  as  it  progresses  toward  retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle. 
Background 

On January 14, 2004, the President articulated a new vision for space exploration 
for  NASA.  Part  of  the  Vision  includes  the  goal  of  retiring  the  Space  Shuttle  fol-
lowing  completion  of  the  International  Space  Station  (ISS),  planned  for  the  end  of 

1 GAO,  Space  Shuttle:  Actions  Needed  to  Better  Position  NASA  to  Sustain  Its  Workforce 

through Retirement, GAO–05–230 (Washington, DC: March 9, 2005). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

37

the decade. In addition, NASA plans to begin developing a new manned exploration 
vehicle,  or  CEV,  to  replace  the  Space  Shuttle  and  return  humans  to  the  moon  as 
early as 2015, but no later than 2020, in preparation for more ambitious future mis-
sions. As this Subcommittee is aware, NASA’s Administrator has recently expressed 
his desire to accelerate the CEV development to eliminate the gap between the end 
of  the  Space  Shuttle  program,  currently  scheduled  for  2010,  and  the  first  manned 
operational flight of the CEV, currently scheduled for 2014. If the CEV development 
cannot  be  accelerated,  NASA  will  not  be  able  to  launch  astronauts  into  space  for 
several  years  and  will  likely  have  to  rely  on  Russia  for  transportation  to  and  from 
the ISS. A 1996 ‘‘Balance Agreement’’ between NASA and the Russian space agency, 
obligated Russia to provide 11 Soyuz spacecraft for crew rotation of U.S. and Russia 
crews.  After  April  2006,  this  agreement  will  be  fulfilled  and  Russia  no  longer  must 
allocate  any  of  the  seats  on  its  Soyuzes  for  U.S.  astronauts.  Russian  officials  have 
indicated  that  they  will  no  longer  provide  crew  return  services  to  NASA  at  no  cost 
at that time. However, NASA may face challenges to compensating Russia for seats 
on  its  Soyuzes  after  the  agreement  is  fulfilled  due  to  restrictions  in  the  Iran  Non-
proliferation Act. 2 

The  Space  Shuttle,  NASA’s  largest  individual  program, 3 is  an  essential  element 
of NASA’s ability to implement the Vision because it is the only launch system pres-
ently  capable  of  transporting  the  remaining  components  necessary  to  complete  as-
sembly  of  the  ISS.  NASA  projects  that  it  will  need  to  conduct  an  estimated  28 
flights over the next 5 to 6 years to complete assembly of and provide logistical sup-
port  to  the  ISS.  However,  NASA  is  currently  examining  alternative  ISS  configura-
tions  to  meet  the  goals  of  the  Vision  and  satisfy  NASA’s  international  partners, 
while requiring as few Space Shuttle flights as possible to complete assembly. 

Prior  to  retiring  the  Space  Shuttle,  NASA  will  need  to  first  return  the  Space 
Shuttle  safely  to  flight 4 and  execute  whatever  number  of  remaining  missions  are 
needed to complete assembly of and provide support for the ISS. At the same time, 
NASA will begin the process of closing out or transitioning its Space Shuttle assets 
that are no longer needed to support the program—such as its workforce, hardware, 
and  facilities—to  other  NASA  programs.  The  process  of  closing  out  or  transitioning 
the program’s assets will extend well beyond the Space Shuttle’s final flight (see fig. 
1). 

Retiring  the  Space  Shuttle  and,  in  the  larger  context,  implementing  the  Vision, 
will  require  that  the  Space  Shuttle  program  rely  on  its  most  important  asset—its 

2 The  Iran  Nonproliferation  Act  (Pub.  L.  106–178).  The  Iran  Nonproliferation  Act  bans  the 
United  States  from  making  extraordinary  payments  to  Russia  in  connection  with  the  Inter-
national Space Station, unless the President determines, among other things, that Russia dem-
onstrated  a  commitment  to  prevent  the  transfer  to  Iran  of  goods,  services,  and  technology  that 
could materially contribute to developing nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, or of ballistic 
or cruise missile systems. 

3 The Space Shuttle program accounted for 27 percent of NASA’s Fiscal Year 2005 budget re-

quest. 

4 To  return  the  Space  Shuttle  to  flight,  NASA  will  conduct  two  flights,  which  are  intended  to 
test and evaluate new procedures for flight safety implemented as a result of the Space Shuttle 
Columbia  accident.  The  planning  window  for  the  first  flight  is  July  13  through  July  31,  2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
o
a
g
8
1
5

38

workforce.  The  Space  Shuttle  workforce  consists  of  about  2,000  civil  service 5 and 
15,600  contractor 6 personnel,  including  a  large  number  of  engineers  and  scientists. 
While each of the NASA centers support the Space Shuttle program to some degree, 
the  vast  majority  of  this  workforce  is  located  at  three  of  NASA’s  Space  Operations 
Centers:  Johnson  Space  Center,  Kennedy  Space  Center,  and  Marshall  Space  Flight 
Center. Data provided by NASA shows that approximately one quarter of the work-
force at its Space Operations centers is 51 years or older and about 33 percent will 
be eligible for retirement by Fiscal Year 2012. 7 

The  Space  Shuttle  workforce  and  NASA’s  human  capital  management  have  been 
the subject of many GAO 8 and other reviews 9 in the past that have highlighted var-
ious  challenges  to  maintaining  NASA’s  science  and  engineering  workforce.  In  addi-
tion, over the past few years, GAO and others in the Federal Government have un-
derscored  the  importance  of  human  capital  management  and  strategic  workforce 
planning. 10 In  response  to  an  increased  governmentwide  focus  on  strategic  human 
capital  management,  NASA  has  taken  several  steps  to  improve  its  human  capital 
management.  These  include  steps  such  as  devising  an  agencywide  strategic  human 
capital  plan,  developing  workforce  analysis  tools  to  assist  in  identifying  critical 
skills  needs,  and  requesting  and  receiving  additional  human  capital  flexibilities.  11 
Progress  Toward  Developing  a  Strategy  To  Sustain  the  Space  Shuttle 

Workforce is Limited 

NASA  has  made  only  limited  progress  toward  developing  a  detailed  longterm 
strategy  for  sustaining  its  workforce  through  the  Space  Shuttle’s  retirement.  While 
NASA recognizes the importance of having in place a strategy for sustaining a criti-
cally  skilled  workforce  to  support  Space  Shuttle  operations,  it  has  only  taken  pre-
liminary  steps  to  do  so.  For  example,  the  program  identified  lessons-learned  from 
the  retirement  of  programs  comparable  to  the  Space  Shuttle,  such  as  the  Air  Force 
Titan IV Rocket Program. Among other things, the lessons learned reports highlight 
the practices used by other programs when making personnel decisions, such as the 
importance of developing transition strategies and early retention planning. 

Other  efforts  have  been  initiated  or  are  planned;  examples  include  the  following:

5 Number  is  based  on  a  full-time  equivalent  calculation.  Full-time  equivalent  is  a  measure  of 
staff  hours  equal  to  those  of  an  employee  who  works  40  hours  per  week  in  1  year;  therefore, 
the  actual  number  of  employees  who  work  part-time  or  full-time  on  the  Shuttle  Program  is 
greater than 2,000. The number was calculated by averaging the number of civil service employ-
ees over Fiscal Year 2004. 

6 The  number  was  calculated  by  averaging  the  number  of  contractor  employees  over  Fiscal 
Year  2004.  This  number  includes  data  from  NASA’s  prime  contractor  for  Space  Shuttle  oper-
ations,  United  Space  Alliance,  and  other  NASA  contractors.  United  Space  Alliance,  established 
in 1996 as a joint venture between Lockheed Martin and Boeing to consolidate NASA’s various 
Space Shuttle program contracts under a single entity, and its approximately 10,400 employees 
are responsible for conducting the Space Shuttle’s ground and flight operations under the Space 
Flight Operations Contract. The remaining contractor personnel are associated with other Space 
Shuttle components, such as its propulsion systems. 

7 Data  provided  by  NASA  is  as  of  September  30,  2004.  GAO  did  not  perform  a  reliability  as-

sessment of the data. 

8 GAO,  Space  Shuttle:  Human  Capital  Challenges  Require  Management  Attention,  GAO/T-
NSIAD–00–133 (Washington, DC: Mar. 22, 2000) and GAO, Space Shuttle: Human Capital and 
Safety  Upgrade  Challenges  Require  Continued  Attention,  GAO/NSIAD/GGD–00–186  (Wash-
ington, DC: August 15, 2000). 

9 Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board,  Report  Volume  I  (Washington,  DC:  August  2003); 
Aerospace  Safety  Advisory  Panel,  Annual  Report  for  2001  (Washington,  DC:  March  2002);  Be-
havioral  Sciences  Technology,  Inc.,  Assessment  and  Plan  for  Organizational  Culture  Change  at 
NASA (Ojai, California: March 15, 2004). 

10 GAO,  High-Risk  Series:  An  Update,  GAO–01–263  (Washington,  DC:  January  2001);  GAO, 
High-Risk  Series:  An  Update,  GAO–03–119  (Washington,  DC:  January  2003);  GAO,  High-Risk 
Series:  An  Update,  GAO–05–207  (Washington,  DC:  January  2005);  GAO,  Performance  Account-
ability  Series—Major  Management  Challenges  and  Program  Risks:  A  Governmentwide  Perspec-
tive,  GAO–01–241  (Washington,  DC:  January  2001);  GAO,  Major  Management  Challenges  and 
Program  Risks:  A  Governmentwide  Perspective,  GAO–03–95  (Washington,  DC:  January  2003); 
GAO,  Major  Management  Challenges  and  Program  Risks:  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Ad-
ministration,  GAO–01–258  (Washington,  DC:  January  2001);  and  GAO,  Major  Management 
Challenges  and  Program  Risks:  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,  GAO–03–114 
(Washington,  DC:  January  2003);  GAO,  Human  Capital:  Key  Principles  for  Effective  Strategic 
Workforce Planning, GAO–04–39 (Washington, DC: December 11, 2003); GAO, A Model of Stra-
tegic  Human  Capital  Management,  GAO–02–373SP  (Washington,  DC:  March  15,  2002);  and 
GAO,  Human  Capital:  A  Self-Assessment  Checklist  for  Agency  Leaders,  GAO/OCG–00–14G 
(Washington, DC: September 1, 2000). See also www.gao.gov/pas/2005. 

11 Enacted in February 2004, the NASA Flexibility Act of 2004 (Pub. L. 108–201) amends title 
5, United States Code, by inserting a new chapter 98 in that title, which provides new authori-
ties  to  NASA.  On  March  26,  2004,  NASA  submitted  a  written  workforce  plan  for  using  its  new 
authorities to Congress. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

39

• contracted  with  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  to  assist  it  in 
planning  for  the  Space  Shuttle’s  retirement  and  transitioning  to  future  pro-
grams; and

• began  devising  an  acquisition  strategy  for  updating  propulsion  system  prime 
contracts  at  MSFC  to  take  into  account  the  Vision’s  goal  of  retiring  the  Space 
Shuttle following completion of the ISS.

NASA’s prime contractor for Space Shuttle operations, USA, has also taken some 
preliminary steps, but its progress with these efforts depends on NASA making deci-
sions  that  impact  contractor  requirements  through  the  remainder  of  the  program. 
For  example,  USA  has  begun  to  define  its  critical  skills  needs  to  continue  sup-
porting  the  Space  Shuttle  program,  devised  a  communication  plan,  contracted  with 
a human capital consulting firm to conduct a comprehensive study of its workforce; 
and  continued  to  monitor  indicators  of  employee  morale  and  workforce  stability. 
Contractor officials said that further efforts to prepare for the Space Shuttle’s retire-
ment  and  its  impact  on  their  workforce  are  on  hold  until  NASA  first  makes  deci-
sions that impact the Space Shuttle’s remaining number of flights and thus the time 
frames for retiring the program and transitioning its assets. 
The  Potential  Impact  of  Workforce  Problems  and  Other  Challenges  the 
Space  Shuttle  Program  Faces  Highlight  the  Need  for  Workforce  Plan-
ning 

Making  progress  toward  developing  a  detailed  strategy  for  sustaining  a  critically 
skilled  Space  Shuttle  workforce  through  the  program’s  retirement  is  important 
given  the  impact  that  workforce  problems  could  have  on  NASA-wide  goals.  Accord-
ing  to  NASA  officials,  if  the  Space  Shuttle  program  faces  difficulties  in  sustaining 
the  necessary  workforce,  NASA-wide  goals,  such  as  implementing  the  Vision  and 
proceeding with space exploration activities, could be impacted. For example, work-
force  problems  could  lead  to  a  delay  in  flight  certification  for  the  Space  Shuttle, 
which could result in a delay to the program’s overall flight schedule, thus compro-
mising the goal of completing assembly of the ISS by 2010. In addition, officials said 
that space exploration activities could slip as much as 1 year for each year that the 
Space Shuttle’s operations are extended because NASA’s progress with these activi-
ties relies on funding and assets that are expected to be transferred from the Space 
Shuttle program to other NASA programs. 

NASA  officials  told  us  they  expect  to  face  various  challenges  in  sustaining  the 

critically skilled Space Shuttle workforce. These challenges include the following:

• Retaining  the  current  workforce.  Because  many  in  the  current  workforce  will 
want  to  participate  in  or  will  be  needed  to  support  future  phases  of  imple-
menting the Vision, it may be difficult to retain them in the Space Shuttle pro-
gram. In addition, it may be difficult to provide certain employees with a transi-
tion  path  from  the  Space  Shuttle  program  to  future  programs  following  retire-
ment.

• Impact  on  the  prime  contractor  for  Space  Shuttle  operations.  Because  USA  was 
established  specifically  to  perform  ground  and  flight  operations  for  the  Space 
Shuttle  program,  its  future  following  the  Space  Shuttle’s  retirement  is  uncer-
tain. Contractor officials stated that a lack of long-term job security would cause 
difficulties  in  recruiting  and  retaining  employees  to  continue  supporting  the 
Space Shuttle as it nears retirement. In addition, steps that the contractor may 
have to take to retain its workforce, such as paying retention bonuses, are likely 
to require funding above normal levels.
• Governmentwide  budgetary  constraints.  Throughout  the  process  of  retiring  the 
Space Shuttle, NASA, like other federal agencies, will have to contend with ur-
gent challenges facing the federal budget that will put pressure on discretionary 
spending—such  as  investments  in  space  programs—and  require  NASA  to  do 
more with fewer resources.

Several Factors Have Impeded Workforce Planning Efforts 

While  the  Space  Shuttle  program  is  still  in  the  early  stages  of  planning  for  the 
program’s retirement, its development of a detailed long-term strategy to sustain its 
future workforce is being hampered by several factors:

• Near-term focus on returning the Space Shuttle to flight. Since the Space Shut-
tle  Columbia  accident,  the  program  has  been  focused  on  its  near-term  goal  of 
returning the Space Shuttle safely to flight. While this focus is understandable 
given  the  importance  of  the  Space  Shuttle’s  role  in  completing  assembly  of  the 
ISS, it has led to the delay of efforts to determine future workforce needs.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

40

• Uncertainties with respect to implementing the Vision. While the Vision has pro-
vided the Space Shuttle program with the goal of retiring the program by 2010 
upon  completion  of  the  ISS,  the  program  lacks  well-defined  objectives  or  goals 
on which to base its workforce planning efforts. For example, NASA has not yet 
determined the final configuration of the ISS, the final number of flights for the 
Space  Shuttle,  how  ISS  operations  will  be  supported  after  the  Space  Shuttle  is 
retired, or the type of vehicle that will be used for space exploration. These de-
terminations  are  important  because  they  impact  decisions  about  the  transition 
of Space Shuttle assets. Lacking this information, NASA officials have said that 
their  ability  to  progress  with  detailed  long-term  workforce  planning  is  limited.
Despite  Uncertainties,  NASA  Could  Follow  a  Strategic  Human  Capital

Management Approach 

Despite  these  uncertainties,  the  Space  Shuttle  program  could  follow  a  strategic 
human  capital  management  approach  to  plan  for  sustaining  its  critically  skilled 
workforce.  Studies  by  several  organizations,  including  GAO,  have  shown  that  suc-
cessful organizations in both the public and private sectors follow a strategic human 
capital  management  approach,  even  when  faced  with  an  uncertain  future  environ-
ment. 

In our March 2005 report, we made recommendations aimed at better positioning 
NASA to sustain a critically skilled Space Shuttle workforce through retirement. In 
particular,  we  recommended  that  the  agency  begin  identifying  the  Space  Shuttle 
program’s  future  workforce  needs  based  upon  various  future  scenarios  the  program 
could face. Scenario planning can allow the agency to progress with workforce plan-
ning, even when faced with uncertainties such as those surrounding the final num-
ber  of  Space  Shuttle  flights,  the  final  configuration  of  the  ISS  and  the  vehicle  that 
will be developed for exploration. The program can use the information provided by 
scenario planning to develop strategies for meeting the needs of its potential future 
scenarios.  NASA  concurred  with  our  recommendation,  and  NASA’s  Assistant  Asso-
ciate  Administrator  for  the  Space  Shuttle  program  is  leading  an  effort  to  address 
the recommendation. 

Since  we  issued  our  report  and  made  our  recommendation,  NASA  has  taken  ac-
tion  and  publicly  recognized  that  human  capital  management  and  critical  skills  re-
tention  will  be  a  major  challenge  for  the  agency  as  it  moves  toward  retiring  the 
Space Shuttle. This recognition was most apparent at NASA’s Integrated Space Op-
erations  Summit  held  in  March  2005.  As  part  of  the  Summit  process,  NASA  insti-
tuted  panel  teams  to  examine  the  Space  Shuttle  program’s  mission  execution  and 
transition needs from various perspectives and make recommendations aimed at en-
suring that the program will execute its remaining missions safely as it transitions 
to  supporting  emerging  exploration  mission  needs.  The  reports  that  resulted  from 
these  examinations  are  closely  linked  by  a  common  theme—the  importance  of 
human  capital  management  and  critical  skills  retention  to  ensure  success.  In  their 
reports, the panel teams highlighted similar challenges to those that we highlighted 
in our report. The panels made various recommendations to the Space Flight Lead-
ership Council on steps that the program should take now to address human capital 
concerns.  These  recommendations  included  developing  and  implementing  a  critical 
skills  retention  plan,  developing  a  communication  plan  to  ensure  the  workforce  is 
informed, and developing a detailed budget that includes funding for human capital 
retention  and  reductions,  as  well  as  establishing  an  agencywide  team  to  integrate 
human capital planning efforts. 
Conclusions 

There  is  no  question  that  NASA  faces  a  challenging  time  ahead.  Key  decisions 
have  to  be  made  regarding  final  configuration  and  support  of  the  ISS,  the  number 
of  shuttle  flights  needed  for  those  tasks,  and  the  timing  for  development  of  future 
programs, such as the CEV—all in a constrained funding environment. In addition, 
any  schedule  slip  in  the  completion  of  the  construction  of  the  ISS  or  in  the  CEV 
falling  short  of  its  accelerated  initial  availability  (as  soon  as  possible  after  Space 
Shuttle retirement) may extend the time the Space Shuttle is needed. But whatever 
decisions  are  made  and  courses  of  action  taken,  the  need  for  sustaining  a  critically 
skilled  workforce  is  paramount  to  the  success  of  these  programs.  Despite  a  limited 
focus  on  human  capital  management  in  the  past,  NASA  now  acknowledges  that  it 
faces significant challenges in sustaining a critically skilled workforce and has taken 
steps to address these issues. We are encouraged by these actions and the fact that 
human  capital  management  and  critical  skills  retention  was  given  such  prominent 
attention  throughout  the  recent  Integrated  Space  Operations  Summit  process.  The 
fact  that  our  findings  and  conclusions  were  echoed  by  the  panel  teams  established 
to  support  the  Integrated  Space  Operations  Summit  is  a  persuasive  reason  for 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

41

NASA  leadership  to  begin  addressing  these  human  capital  issues  early  and  aggres-
sively. 

Madam  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to 
respond to any questions that you or other Members of the Subcommittee may have.

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Dr.  Freese,  I  would  like  for  you  to  go  back 
and  expand  a  little  bit  on  the  concerns  that  you  have  from  a  na-
tional security standpoint about the United States having the inde-
pendent ability to launch and support humans in space. 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Space  has  always  had  a  very  strong  sym-
bolic  value.  Today  we  term  that  techno-nationalism.  That  is—
science and technology is an indicator of national power. And with 
space  representing  the  future,  any  slippage  in  U.S.  leadership  in 
human spaceflight capability translates into a negative indicator of 
national power. 

Countries  are  acutely  aware  of  that.  And  specifically,  China  is 
reaping  great  rewards  in  techno-nationalism  right  now  from  its 
very  incremental  and  very  spartan,  but  very  ambitious,  human 
spaceflight  program.  That  creates  a  perception  of  competition, 
where  the  Chinese  only  have  to  be  consistent  and  we  have  to—we 
are put in a position where we are racing against ourselves to out-
do  our  past,  our  glorious  space  past.  And  I  think  this  puts  us  in 
a very precarious position. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Is  there  anything  quantifiable  about  what 
we  would  lose  if  we  could  not  put  humans  into  space  within  a  5-
year period, other than perception of power loss? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  Well,  again,  perception  is  soft  power.  And 
while that is very hard to quantify, it is very real. There are some 
fields,  certainly  there  is  medical  research  and  there  are  certain 
fields,  life  support  research,  that  have  to  do  with  human  space 
flight which has technology benefits that we would lose in. But my 
work  primarily  focuses  on  the  soft  power  issues,  which  I  think  are 
considerable. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Mr.  Li,  let  me  just  ask  you:  What  do  you 
think  are  the  highest  risk  workforce  retention  issues  that  you  see 
as  we  get  toward  2010,  while  also  trying  to  get  the  Crew  Return 
Vehicle online? 

Mr.  LI.  Thank  you  for  that  question.  I  think  at  issue  here  is  if 
we  do  not  have  a  plan  that  is  fully  understood  by  the  workforce, 
they will migrate toward what is best for them. And that unknown 
may  be  not  knowing  what  the  program,  future  program,  will  be. 
And  they  might  in  essence  leave  the  Shuttle  workforce,  which 
would be very bad, obviously in terms of safety. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Senator Nelson? 
Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  McCulley,  you  are  experiencing  that  right 

now, are you not, with some of your young engineers? 

Mr.  MCCULLEY.  Yes,  sir,  I  am.  And  one  quick  anecdotal  story.  I 
have a young man from Pennsylvania who came out of college and 
moved  to  Florida  specifically  to  work  on  our  nations  space  pro-
grams  and  in  particular,  human  spaceflight  programs.  Last  week 
in the cafeteria at the Kennedy Space Center he said, ‘‘Mike, what 
about my future? I’ve got two children now and a wife. And there’s 
jobs  in  Pennsylvania  that  I’m  aware  of.  And  I’m  debating  whether 
or not I should take it.’’ And he is in a very serious internal debate 
with his family. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

42

Now  I  will  tell  you  that  at  this  point  we  have  no  problem  at  all 
in  recruiting,  which  has  been  very,  very  pleasing,  given  the  acci-
dent.  We  are  having  no  problems  at  all  getting  good  people.  I  do 
not  think  we  will  have  any  problem  for  the  next  year  or  two.  But 
my  folks  are  starting  to  think  about,  what  do  I  do  post-Shuttle 
until  we  get  a  more  definition?  And  I  applaud  Dr.  Griffin’s  efforts 
to get that definition sooner rather than later. 

Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Freese,  in  our  world  of  politics  perception 
is  not  only  soft  power,  it  is  hard  power.  But  thank  you  for  telling 
us  about  what  perception  means  to  the  world  with  regard  to  the 
United  States  space  program.  Taking  that  a  step  further,  what 
happens  to  our  perception  if  our  partners,  our  international  part-
ners up there on the Space Station either are there because it has 
been completed or not there because it has not been completed, and 
it  comes  2010  and  there  is  no  Space  Shuttle  to  service  and  build 
the Space Station? 

Dr.  JOHNSON-FREESE.  That  is  a  scenario  that  I  do  not  think 
would  be  in  our  best  interest.  I  strongly  believe  we  need  to  be  co-
opting  others  to  work  with  us  inclusively  so  that  we  can  avoid  a 
situation  where  the  United  States  is  the  odd  man  out  potentially 
on the Space Station. And that could occur. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Horowitz, what are the advantages to using 

Space Shuttle-derived systems for helping implement this CEV? 

Dr.  HOROWITZ.  Thank  you,  Senator.  Well,  as  everyone  else,  we 
are  very  concerned  about  the  gap.  And  the  best  way  to  avoid  the 
gap  is  to  take  the  equipment  that  we  already  have  at  our  dis-
posal—I mean, we already have the solid rocket booster first stage 
of the vehicle that I described. It is already built and flying today. 
So we can minimize the amount of development time, and the cost. 
And  then  we  can  meet  the  ambitious  schedule  of  having  a  Crew 
Exploration  Vehicle  ready  to  fly  in  2010,  because  we  have  most  of 
the propulsion components already. They are already human-rated. 
And it will be safer and more effective than anything else we could 
do. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  of  course,  that  will  be  something  that 

NASA will be looking at——

Dr. HOROWITZ. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.—trying  to  make  that  decision,  what  is  best 

safety-wise, as well as from a cost and timing schedule. 

Thank  you,  Madame  Chairman.  This  has  been  an  excellent,  ex-
cellent  hearing.  And  you  have  compressed  it  into  35  minutes.  It  is 
a record, Madame Chairman. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Well,  thank  you.  It  took  the  cooperation  of 
everyone involved. And let me just make one last quick statement. 
And  that  is  that  I  do  believe  that  NASA  is  looking  at  and  will  be 
working  with  you,  Mr.  McCulley,  to  use  many  of  the  people  who 
are  also  doing  the  Space  Shuttle  for  the  Crew  Return  Vehicle  evo-
lution.  So  I  do  not  think  the  picture  is  totally  bleak  here.  I  think 
there will be a lot of overlap that will help to keep our best people. 
And I know that between you and Dr. Griffin and all of the people 
in  your  two  organizations  that  you  will  work  hard  to  coordinate 
that. 

I want to remind everyone that all the statements and additional 
materials  from  the  witnesses  will  be  made  a  part  of  the  hearing 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

43

record, and also any answers that you might have to questions that 
might not have been asked but will be submitted to you in writing 
by members will also be made a part of the record. 

Thank you for the cooperation on this very short time frame. We 
appreciate it. We have learned a lot in a short time, and we appre-
ciate your cooperation. 

Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 11:35 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
First,  I  would  like  to  welcome  Administrator  Griffin  back  to  the  Commerce  Com-
mittee.  Last  month,  you  came  before  us  as  the  nominee  to  head  NASA,  and  now 
you  are  back  to  have  a  discussion  on  one  of  your  most  difficult  challenges,  moving 
human spaceflight out of the Shuttle era. 

Of  course  before  we  do  that,  NASA  needs  to  return  the  Shuttle  safely  to  flight. 
You’ve  done  a  lot  of  work  since  February  2003,  and  we  will  all  be  rooting  for  you 
in  July.  It  is  my  hope  that  you’ve  really  started  to  fix  what  the  Columbia  Accident 
Investigation Board called the ‘‘cultural problems.’’ 

Administrator Griffin, I commend you on delaying the next flight from May until 

July so that you could satisfy yourself of its safety. 

The  Committee  will  also  be  watching  closely  as  you  continue  to  refine  the  plans 
for  our  next  generation  space  transportation  system.  We  all  agree.  A  4-year  or 
longer  gap  in  the  United  States’  ability  to  fly  humans  into  space  is  unacceptable. 
We need a safe, robust, capable crew exploration vehicle and the cargo and lift sys-
tems  to  support  it.  I  hope  that  you  will  help  us  understand  the  tradeoffs  that  will 
need to be made to get that system sooner rather than later. 

Of course, as we look to the future, we cannot abandon the past. The Space Shut-
tle will need to meet an aggressive schedule over the next 5 years. We need to com-
plete  the  Space  Station  and  to  use  the  lab  we  have  built.  We  should  not  abandon 
the  important  science  NASA  does,  whether  it  is  the  Hubble  Space  telescope,  Earth 
science, or aeronautics. I look forward to working with you and the Members of the 
Committee to ensure NASA can keep reaching for the stars.

Æ

(45)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:21 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025323 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25323.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

